1148 01177 3785 



DATE DUE 




THE LAW OF LOVE 

AND 
THE LAW OF VIOLENCE 



LEO TOLSTOY 



THE LAW OF LOVE 

AND THE 

LAW OF VIOLENCE 



TRANSLATED BY 

MARY KOUTOUZOW TOLSTOY 



RUDOLPH FIELD 

Publisher 
NEW YORK 



Copyright 1948, by 
MARY KOUTOUZOW TOLSTOY 



THE LAW OF LOVE 

and 
THE LAW OF VIOLENCE 



NOTE 



The work of Count Leo Tolstoy entitled: "The 
Law o Love and the Law of Violence/ 5 has never 
been published in Russia; and consequently was not 
translated into English with the rest of his works. A 
Russian author, M. Halperine-Kaminsky, trans 
lated it into French from the manuscript and pub 
lished it in France. 

Shortly after its publication Paul Bourget's 
drama, "La Barricade," was produced in Paris. This 
play, based on the idea of inter-class warfare, was 
the subject of much controversy. It was even sup 
posed that, in answer, Tolstoy wrote this treatise 
with its theory of the "Law of Love* 3 as opposed to 



6 Note 

the "Right of Violence" proclaimed by the French 
master and his friends; but this supposition was 
erroneous, for the book was published first. 

M. Halperine-Kaminsky sent Count Tolstoy 
criticisms of the play from the pens of such well- 
known writers as Rene Dounic and M. de Mun, and 
received the following reply: 

MY DEAR HALPERINE-KAMINSKY: 

Thank you very much for the articles on "The Bar 
ricade." I read the most interesting ones at once. 

Yes, it is a very significant phenomenon, and I should 
like to give you my opinion on this subject. But I have so 
little strength left, and so short a time to live, and so 
much work on hand, that I doubt if I shall entirely 
realize my desire. 

For the moment, what struck me most in the debates 
caused by Mr. Bourget's play is their astonishing mixture 
of profound erudition, great intelligence, extraordinary 
elegance of language, and subtle courtesy towards the 
adversary; but also the most brutal egotism, concerned 
only with personal and class interest, and absolute ignor 
ance of religious and moral principles, even those that 
are indispensable to our lives, and without which man 
descends to the level of the beasts; in spite of the inven 
tion of marvellous flying machines, or of the wonderful 
perfection of the artists of the Theatre Frangais, of the 
Vaudeville, etc. 

I am particularly surprised that men like M. Bourget 
and his friends can still speak so seriously of Catholicism 
in France in 1910, after Voltaire, Rousseau, and many 



Note 7 

other thinkers. Nothing proves more clearly how mis 
guided these men have been; not as to their intelligence, 
but as to their reasoning; not their polish, brilliancy, but 
their morality. In this conflict it is evident that f<ws les 
moyens sont bom. 1 

We know well, they say, that Catholicism is the most 

vulgar, the most absurd, and the most stupifying of lies, 

and that it has long since been denounced and stripped 

bare; but it serves our purposes: let us make use of it ... 

My best wishes, 

LEO TOLSTOY 

It is interesting to see what Tolstoi thought of 
the state of the world just before the Great War, 
In spite of his apparent pessimism, he was as hopeful 
as Mr. H. G. Wells for the future condition of man 
kind. But in his sweeping denunciation of legisla 
tors, judges, and all sorts of authorities, he went far 
beyond the English writer, who says: "Our state 
could have grown up in no other way. We had to 
have these general dealers in human relationship, 
politicians and lawyers, as a necessary stage in 
political and social advancement. Just as we had to 
have soldiers and policemen to save people from 
mutual violence." 2 



1 All means are justifiable. In French in the original text. 

2 Men Like Gods, P. 283. 



PREFACE 
88 



The light is come into the world, and men loved 
the darkness rather than the light; for their works 
were evil. For every one that doeth evil hateth the 
light, and cometh not to the light, lest his works 
should be reproved. But he that doeth the truth 
cometh to the light, that his works may be made 
manifest, that they have been wrought in God. 

(John, iii, 19-21.) 

The worst thing of all is when man begins to 
fear the truth lest it denounce him. 

(Blaise Pascal.) 

The glory of the good is in their conscience and 
not in the mouths of men. 1 

The only reason why I am writing this is because, 
knowing the one means of salvation for Christian 
humanity, from its physical suffering as well as from 
the moral corruption in which it is sunk, I, who am 
on the edge of the grave, cannot be silent. 

All thinking people must admit that the present 



* The epigraphs placed at the beginning of the chapters, and not signed, 
arc quotations from Tolstoy's works, made by the author himself. (Note 
of the translator.) 

8 



Preface 9 

life of Christian nations will deteriorate more and 
more if we cannot make up our minds to modify 
it. The misery of the disinherited and the luxury 
of the rich increase each day; the struggle of all 
against all: revolutionaries against governments, 
governments against revolutionaries, oppressed na 
tions against their oppressors, state against state, 
the West against the East, is becoming ever more 
bitter. 

Many are aware of this; unfortunately they very 
rarely see the cause of the lamentable situation, and 
still less the means of remedying it. They give all 
sorts of reasons for it, and propose numerous 
remedies, but not the right one. 

The cause of the unhappy situation of Christian 
humanity is the lack of a superior conception of life 
and a rule of conduct in accordance with it, a rule 
held in common by all people professing Chris 
tianity. 

The cure for this situation, a cure neither fan 
tastic nor artificial, but natural, can be found in 
the practical observance of the conception of life 
revealed to humanity nineteen centuries ago, and 
which answers to-day to the intellectual and moral 
development of humanity; that is to say, the Chris 
tian Doctrine in its true sense. 



THE LAW OF LOVE 
AND THE LAW OF VIOLENCE 



One of the most vulgar of superstitions is that 
of the wise men who believe that one can live 
without faith. 

(Daily Reading, 2nd Part, Introduction.) 1 

True religion consists in establishing the relation 
of each of us towards the infinite life that sur 
rounds us, the life that unites us to the infinite, 
and guides us in all our acts. 

(Daily Reading, 2nd Part, 1, 2.) 

If you feel that you no longer have faith, know 
that you are in the most dangerous situation in 
which a man can find himself on earth. 



1 The work entitled Daily Reading, from which many epigraphs are 
taken, was written by Tolstoy with quotations from his own writings, and 
from those of great writers of all countries and all times. 

10 



The Law of Violence 11 

Men live in a reasonable way and on good terms 
with each other when they are united by the same 
conception of life; that is to say, by a religion that 
satisfies all of them alike and gives them the 
same rule of conduct. But when it happens that the 
conception of life, modified by moral and intel 
lectual progress, becomes more precise and exacts 
a new rule of conduct, while men continue to fol 
low the former one, their lives become unhappy 
and they no longer live in harmony. 

The evil is aggravated more and more as men 
continue to ignore the new religious conception 
and its consequent rule of conduct, and when they 
observe the law imposed by the antiquated rule. 
Instead of admitting the religious conception cor 
responding to the phase of their development, they 
form a conception that justifies their way of living, 
but does not correspond to the moral needs of the 
majority. 

This phenomenon has been repeated on several 
occasions in the history of humanity; but never, I 
believe, has the discord, between the various peoples 
and the religious conception that they have adopted 
been so great: indeed, they continue to live a pagan 
life. 

In my opinion this discord is so marked because 
the Christian conception of life, at the moment of 
its formation, goes far beyond the moral and intel- 



12 The Law of Love 

lectual state of the nations who acknowledged 
it at that time. That is why the rule of conduct 
which it indicated was too greatly opposed not only 
to individual habits but even to the whole social 
organization of pagans, who became Christians in 
name only. 

Thus it is that these nations have become attached 
to a false Christianity, represented by the Church, 
whose principles differ from those of paganism only 
by a lack of sincerity. For that very reason faith 
in the Christian doctrines disappeared little by little 
without being replaced by any other. That is why 
the Christian world finds itself in its present 
condition: the majority of its adherents possess 
no explanation of the meaning of life, that is to say, 
no religion and no common rule of conduct. 

The working masses, even though they out 
wardly profess the religion of the Church, do not 
believe in it, do not practice it in their daily lives, 
and follow its traditions by habit, by convention. 
As for the so-called cultivated classes, they either 
believe positively in nothing at all, or rather they 
pretend to believe in the Christianity of the Church 
for political reasons; or else a small minority believe 
sincerely in the Christian doctrines, contrary to 
the life it leads, and seeks to justify its belief by all 
sorts of insidious sophisms. 

There is only one reason for the unhappy condi- 



The Law of Violence 13 

tion in which Christianity now finds itself. 

It is still more complicated by the fact that be 
cause of its long duration, some of the leaders who 
profit by this unbelief, pretend to believe what 
they do not believe at all; others, the more intel 
lectual, who are the most corrupt, openly preach 
the futility for men of our time of such a concep 
tion of life, or faith, and the rides of conduct that 
result from it; they try to make them believe that 
the only fundamental law of human life is the 
struggle for existence, guided by our passions or 
our natural needs. 

The regrettable cause of all our misery is, there 
fore, this unconscious lack of faith of the masses 
and the conscious ignoring of the necessity for 
religion by the so-called cultivated classes. 



II 



Men has an Irrestible tendency to believe that 
no one sees him when he himself does not see: like 
children who close their eyes so that no one may 
see them, 

(Lichtenberg.) 

Men of our time believe that all the insanity 
and cruelty of our lives, the enormous wealth of a 
few, the envious poverty of the majority, the wars 
and every form of violence, are perceived by 
nobody, and that nothing prevents us from con 
tinuing to live thus. 

Error continues, nevertheless, to be error, even 
when it is accepted by the majority. 

(Daily Reading, 6-ix, 7, 8, and the conclusion.) 

Having accepted the Christian doctrine in the 
form corrupted by the Church, the pagans, satis 
fied at first with the new doctrine, withdrew little 
by little from the Christianity of the" Church, and 
ended by living without any religious conception of 
life and the rules of conduct resulting from it, 

As the majority of men are unable to live without 
a common rule of conduct, life, as I have said, 

14 



The Law of Violence 



gradually becomes unhappier. It will not be able 
to continue to exist in its present form. 

Farm laborers, dispossessed of the land, and con 
sequently of the possibility of enjoying the fruit of 
their labor, hate the landed proprietors and capital 
ists who enslave them. The proprietors and the 
capitalists, knowing the sentiments they inspire in 
the workers, distrust them, doubt them, and seek 
to keep them in submission by the organized force 
of government. Thus it is that the situation of 
the workers is continually aggravated and their 
dependence upon the rich increases; while the 
wealth of the rich, their power over the workers, 
their fear and their hate, continues to increase. 

This is equally the cause of the progressive in 
crease of armaments of nation against nation; of 
the expense caused by employing workmen for 
military preparation on land, on sea, and in the 
air; preparations having international carnage as 
an only end. And these murders are committed 
because all Christian people (not individuals, but 
people united in states), hate each other and are 
ready at any moment to hurl themselves at each 
other. 

Thus it is that each great power, by observing 
antiquated patriotic traditions, oppress one or 
several groups of nations and force them to par 
ticipate in the life of the dominating nations that 



1 6 The Law of Love 



they hate, for example: Austria, Prussia, England, 
Russia, France, oppress Poland, Ireland, India, Fin 
land, the Caucasus, Algeria, etc. This is the way 
that, apart from the hatred of the poor and the 
rich, and of independent states, the hatred of op 
pressed nations for their oppressors is developing 
and spreading. 

The worst is that all these hatreds, so contrary to 
human nature, are not condemned as bad senti 
ments, but, on the contrary, are exalted, and raised 
to the pinnacle of virtues. 

The hatred of the oppressed workers for the rich 
is praised in the same degree as love of liberty, 
fraternity, equality. The hatred of Germans for 
French, English for Americans, Russians for Jap 
anese, and vice versa, is considered a patriotic 
virtue. The hatred of Poles for Russians and Prus 
sians, Prussians and Russians for Poles and Finns, 
is even more intense. 

But the plagues to which I have drawn attention 
are not sufficient to demonstrate the impossibility 
of continuing our present mode of life. 

If our world possessed a rule of religious conduct, 
we could look upon the evils that inflict it as tem 
porary, occasional phenomena. In reality, the 
religion which we see professed is a mendacious one. 
There are even several, Catholic, Orthodox, Prot 
estant, etc., etc. and all are in a state of permanent 



The Law of Violence 17 

hostility. There exists also a false science, equally 
divided, whose denominations quarrel with each 
other. There are political and international lies of 
different parties; lies of art, lies of tradition and 
habit, lies of all sorts, but no rule of moral conduct 
imposed by a religious conception. 

The men of the Christian world also lead the 
existence of beasts, and take their selfish interests 
for guides and are in a state of perpetual struggle 
among themselves. What distinguishes them from 
the beasts are the latter 's constant need of food and 
claws for defense; while men pass with dizzy haste 
from roads to railroads, from animal locomotion to 
steam, from the spoken word and manuscripts to 
printing, to the telegraph, the telephone; from 
sailing vessels to transatlantic liners, from steel arms 
to cannon, machine guns, bombs, and aeroplanes. 
It is this overwrought life we lead that is getting 
madder and madder, unhappier and unhappier, 
because men, instead of keeping to a spiritual, 
moral principle that would unite them in a society 
of peace and concord, are guided by their bestial 
instincts which they seek to satisfy by trading on 
their intellectual faculties. 



Ill 



But whoso shall cause one of these little ones 
that believe on me to stumble, it is profitable for 
him that a great millstone should be hanged about 
his neck, and that he should be sunk in the depth 
of the sea. 

(Matthew, xviii, 6, 7.) 

One cannot struggle against the calls of con- 
sciencer these calls come from God; that is why 
it is preferable to answer them at once. 

(Daily Reading, October 23rd.) 

The evil committed by man not only weakens 
his soul and deprives him of true happiness, but 
the more often falls back on the one who com 
mits it. 

To do wrong is as dangerous as to provoke a 
wild beast. 

More frequently than not evil falls back on the 
one who has committed it. 

(Daily Reading, June 6th.) 

The majority of the men of our time, perceiving 
the constant increase, of their misfortunes, employ 
the only means of salvation that, according to their 

18 



The Law of Violence 19 

conception of life, they consider rational: the op 
pression of part by the rest. 

Those who see that their interest lies in the main 
tenance of the present state defend it with the force 
that the Church puts at their command: those who 
wish to change the order of existing things also 
have recourse to violence in order to replace the 
former state by a new one that they think better. 

The number of revolutionaries and counter re 
volutionaries in the Christian world cannot be 
counted. However, if the social forms are modified, 
the base remains the same. The domination of a 
few over the majority, corruption, lies, the fear of 
the oppressed, servitude, anger and the brutalizing 
of the masses, all these things remain as they were, 
and even spread and develop. 

What is going on now in Russia, in particular, 
gives evidential proof of the futility and harm of 
using violence as a means of uniting men. 

The incidents, so frequent a short time ago, of 
highway robbery, assassination of policemen, of 
ficers, detectives, attacks on high functionaries, are 
becoming rarer every day, while death sentences 
and executions are increasing. 

For the past two years they have not stopped 
shooting and hanging people, and those executed 
can be counted by thousands. Thousands also were 
killed by revolutionary bombs, But since the num- 



20 The Law of Love 

ber of those killed by the leaders o the state is 
incomparably greater than those killed by revolu 
tionaries, the former triumph and believe that they 
have conquered. They do not doubt that they will 
be able to continue their usual existence of main 
taining lies by violence, and violence by lies. 

The mistake of all political doctrines, from the 
most conservative to the most advanced, which has 
brought men to their present lamentable condition, 
is the same: to keep men in society by the aid of 
violence so as to make them accept the present 
social organization and the rule of conduct that it 
imposes. 

Certainly, it is possible to push a man forcibly 
in the direction that he refuses to take. It is thus 
that animals, as well as men led by passion, act. 
It is natural and comprehensible. But how shall one 
understand the reasoning by which violence is a 
means of inviting men to do everything we wish 
them to do? 

Constraint always consists in forcing others, by 
threats of suffering or death, to do what they 
refuse to do. That is why they act against their 
own wishes as long as they consider themselves 
weaker than their oppressors. From the moment 
that they feel themselves stronger, they will not 
only cease to obey, but, irritated by the struggle 
and by all that they have suffered, they will first 



The Law of Violence 21 

gain their liberty, and tlien in their turn they will 
impose their .will upon those who disagree with 
them. So it should be quite evident that the straggle 
between oppressors and oppressed, far from con 
stituting a means of social organization, leads to 
disorder and general disagreement. 

It is so certain that it would be superfluous to 
speak of it if the lie, according to which violence is 
a means of reunion, had not been implanted for 
so long a time, and was not admitted by tacit con 
sent to be an indisputable truth, as much by those 
who profit by it as the majority of those who 
are victims of violence. 

This lie existed before the Christian era, and has 
since survived in all its strength. The only difference 
between former times and our own is that then 
the non-sense of violence as a means of grouping 
was hidden from men, while to-day the truth of 
Christ, according to which violence is a means of 
disunion, stands out more and more clearly. The 
moment that men understand it they will no longer 
be able to endure violence without revolting 
against it. 

This is observed to-day among the oppressed in 
every country. 

Not only the oppressed are beginning to per 
ceive this truth; the oppressors, in their turn, are 
aware of it. They are no longer certain of acting 



22 The Law of Love 



well and justly when they use violence towards the 
weak. Accustomed to their reciprocal situations, 
the leaders and the led are seeking to persuade each 
other by arguments mostly false, that brute force 
is necessary and useful, but they feel already deep 
within themselves that their acts of cruelty, instead 
of gaining, draw them further away from the 
desired end. 



IV 



When, among a hundred men one man domin 
ates ninety-nine, it is iniquity, it is despotism; 
when ten dominate ninety, it is injustice; it is 
oligarchy; when fifty-one dominate forty-nine 
(and this only theoretically, for, in reality, among 
these fifty-one there are ten or twelve masters), 
then it is justice, then it is liberty. 

Could one imagine anything more ridiculous, 
more absurd, then this reasoning? However, this 
is the very one that serves as a basic principle for 
every one who extolls better social conditions. 

All the nations in the world are restless. An 
active force that seems to be preparing the way 
for a cataclysm is felt everywhere. Man has never 
assumed so great a responsibility. Each moment 
brings care that becomes more and more absorbing. 
One has the impression that something great is 
going to be accomplished. But on the eve of the 
appearance of Christ the world was then, also, 
expecting great events; yet it did not welcome 
Him when He came. In the same way the world 
might feel the birth pangs before His next coming 
and go on failing to understand what Is hap 
pening. 

(Lucie Malaury. Daily Reading, 

June 30th.) 
23 



24 The Law of Love 

And be not afraid of them that kill the body, 
but are not able to kill the soul: but rather fear 
him who is able to destroy both soul and body in 
Hell. 

(Matthew, x, 28.) 

The States of the Christian world have not only 
reached, but in our day have passed the limits 
towards which the states of ancient times were 
approaching before their dismemberment. We can 
see by this fact that each step that we make to-day 
towards material progress not only does not ad 
vance us towards the general well-being, but shows 
us, on the contrary, that all these technical improve 
ments increase our miseries. Submarines, subter 
ranean and aerial machines may be invented for 
transporting men with the rapidity of lightning; 
the means of propagating speech and human 
thought may be multiplied ad infinitum; but it 
would still remain a fact that the travellers, who are 
so comfortably and rapidly transported are neither 
willing nor able to commit anything but evil, and 
their thoughts and words can only incite men to 
evil. As to the perfected arms of destruction, which, 
while diminishing the risk of those who employ 
them, make carnage easier, they give evidential 
proof of the impossibility of persevering in the 
same direction. 

Thus, the horror of the situation of the Chris- 



The Law of Violence 25 

tian world appears under a double aspect: the 
absence of a moral principle of union and a gradual 
lowering of man to a degree below that of animals, 
in spite of all his intellectual progress and, above 
all, the -complexity of the lies that hide our miser 
able condition and our cruelty. 

The lies cover the cruelty, the cruelty causes the 
spreading of the lies, and both increase like snow 
balls. 

But everything must come to an end. And I 
consider that a crisis in this unfortunate condition 
is approaching. 

The Christian world must inevitably get to the 
end of this horrible situation, and it must as inevi 
tably get out of it. The evils, resulting from the lack 
of a religious conception corresponding to our 
epoch, are the inevitable condition of progress. 
They should also disappear as inevitably after the 
adoption of a religious principle that would cor 
respond to our epoch. 



V 



From the day when the first members of coun 
cils placed exterior authority higher than interior, 
that is to say, recognized the decisions of men 
united in councils as more important and more 
sacred than reason and conscience; on that day 
began the lies that caused the loss of millions of 
human beings and which continue their unhappy 
work to the present day. 

In 1682 the English doctor Laitan, an honorable 
man, having written a book against the bishopric, 
was judged and condemned to the following 
punishment: he was cruelly whipped, one ear was 
cut off, his nose was split, and the initials of the 
words Trouble Maker were marked on one cheek 
with a hot iron* Seven days later he was again 
whipped, although the wounds of his former 
punishment were not yet healed; the other side of 
his nose was split, his other ear cut off, and his 
other cheek marked. All this was done in the name 
of Christian charity. 

(Maurice Davidson,) 

Christ founded no church, established no State, 
made no laws, imposed no government or exterior 

26 



_^ The Law of Violence 27 

authority; he simply set himself to write the law 
of God in the hearts of men in order that they 
might govern themselves. 

(Herbert Newton.) 

The special characteristic of the situation in 
which the Christian world finds itself to-day is that 
its social organization is founded on the doctrine 
that, in its true acceptance, is ruining the existing 
state of things; and that this acceptance, hidden 
until now, is beginning to appear. 

One might compare this organization to a house 
built, not even on sand, but on ice. That is why its 
foundation is melting, and the house is beginning 
to fall to pieces. 

As long as the majority of the faithful, deceived 
by the Church, have only a rudimentary idea of the 
doctrine of Christ, and in the place of former 
fetiches adore Christ-God, his mother, the saints, 
the relics; as long as they believe in miracles, in the 
Holy Sacrament, in the Redemption, in the infal 
libility of the princes of the Church, the pagan 
organization of life can keep going and give every 
satisfaction to the believers. They also accept the 
meaning of life that the Church gives them and 
the rule of conduct that results from it. And this 
faith, too, concurs in the union of men. 

Unhappily for the faith imposed by the Church, 
there exist the Scriptures, that the Church itself has 



28 The Law of Love 

recognized as holy. In spite of the efforts of the 
ecclesiastics to hide the true meaning of the evan 
gelistic doctrine from the laity; in spite of having 
forbidden the Scriptures to be translated into the; 
language of the people; in spite of its false inter 
pretations, nothing can hide the light that filters 
through the lies of the Church, and illuminates the 
souls of those whose eyes are opening more and 
more to the truth. 

In proportion as education has spread, as print 
ing has replaced writing, the Scriptures have become 
more accessible. Men cannot help but perceive 
the striking contradiction between the order of 
existing things upheld by the Church, and the 
evangelistic doctrine that it acknowledges as being 
holy. Read and understood as it is, the Scriptures 
appear to be a frank and explicit denial of both the 
State and the Church. 

In becoming more and more evident, this con 
tradiction resulted in the loss of the faith imposed 
by the Church, and it is only by tradition, pro 
priety, or fear that the majority of men continue 
to practice the outer forms of the Catholic, Or 
thodox or Protestant cults but without believing 
in the inner truths of this religion. 

I do not mention here the little communities that 
reject the ecclesiastic doctrines entirely and which 
profess their own doctrine, approaching more or 



The Law of Violence 29 

less to the true Christian teaching; the number of 
their adherents are too few in comparison with the 
enormous quantity of men who are becoming more 
and more devoid of any religious sentiment, 
If the popular masses still practice the official cult 
outwardly, the upper classes, perceiving with still 
more precision the contradictions contained in the 
Church doctrine, turn away from it entirely; but 
they cannot adopt the true doctrine of Christ, since 
this is in opposition to the existing state and would 
ruin the privileges they enjoy. 

It follows that the immense majority of the 
Christian world practice the forms of the Church 
simply by interest, propriety, or fear, while the 
minority not only do not acknowledge the existing 
religion, but still further, influenced by what is 
called science, consider all religions as vestiges of 
superstition, and act only under the impulse of their 
instincts. 

The nations who had accepted the Christian 
doctrine at the time when this doctrine was superior 
to their moral development, will fall into a state 
of complete irreligion, and their moral level will 
descend lower than that of nations who profess 
much inferior, and even quite vulgar beliefs. 



VI 



The corruption of Christianity takes us further 
away from the establishment of the Kingdom of 
God on earth; but Christian truth, like fires that 
smoulder in dry wood, has consumed its covering 
and broken forth. The meaning of Christianity 
has already been revealed to every one, and its 
action is becoming greater than the veil that 
covers it. 



I see a new religion, founded on confidence in 
man, calling upon the unspoiled sentiments that 
are lying asleep in us, believing that we can love 
good for itself without any idea of recompense 
and that the divine principle is in us. 

(Solter.) 

What we require, what is necessary for the 
people, what our time needs for us to be raised 
from the mud of egotism in which we are plunged, 
is faith, thanks to it our souls will stop wan 
dering in pursuit of selfish ends and will be able to 
march in unison by acknowledging one origin, 
one law, one end. Every firm belief that rises from 
the ruins of former religions modifies the order of 
existing things, for all strong beliefs accompany 
every branch of human activity. 

30 



The Law of Violence 31 



Humanity repeats in two different formulas 
and in different degrees the words of the prayer: 
"Thy Kingdom come on earth as it is in Heaven." 

(Mazzini.) 

One can neither weigh nor measure the evil 
that false religion has caused and is still causing. 

Religion is the establishment of the relation 
that exists between man, God and the universe, 
and the definition of man's mission that results 
from it. How miserable our lives would be if this 
relation and this definition were false. 

It is not sufficient to throw away the false 
religion, that is to say, the false relation of man as 
regards the universe; we must still establish the 
true. 

(Daily Reading) September 19th.) 

The fact that one part of the pagan world ac 
cepted a religious doctrine, whiph, far from being 
at the highest moral level of the society of that 
time, sapped the bases of the social state, is rather 
tragic, but at the same time constitutes the most 
fortunate event that could happen to nations pro 
fessing the Christian religion. 

Presented to pagans in an unnatural form, this 
doctrine appeared to them as a simple attenuation of 
their vulgar conception of the Divinity, as a higher 
idea of the mission of man and his moral needs. But 



32 The Law of Lave 

the real significance of the doctrine was so hidden 
from them by dogmas and practices of their cults, 
that they did not even suspect it. All this in spite 
of the precise teaching of Christ in the Scriptures, 
which is acknowleged as a divine revelation by the 
Church. 

Happily this doctrine corresponds so well with 
the spiritual nature of man, that in spite of the 
mass of dogmas under which it is buried, those who 
have greater intuition of the truth see through its 
real meaning and realize how it contradicts the 
order of existing things. 

The fathers of the ancient church: Tatien, Clem 
ent, Origen, Tertullian, Lactance and others, had 
already realized this contradiction. It was the same 
in the Middle Ages. It was revealed with particular 
force in modern times. And its recognition is shown 
by the appearance of a great number of religious 
sects, which reject the government that is contrary 
to the Christian doctrine condemning violence. 

It was equally recognized by the humanitarian 
doctrines that claim to have nothing in common 
with Christianity, and which are really nothing else 
than partial manifestations of the Christian con 
science; such are the socialist, communist and an 
archist doctrines. 

The cause of the sufferings of Christian nations 
is thus the theoretical acceptance of a doctrine, 



The Law of Violence 33 

which when applied, should inevitably abolish the 
order of things to which these nations are accus 
tomed and which they do not wish to renounce. 

Their great good fortune is having admitted 
Christianity, which, even when false, includes the 
truth. In fact, these nations to-day are brought to 
the necessity of recognizing the true meaning of 
the doctrine, which alone is able to save men from 
their present hopeless condition. 



VII 



The principal cause of our bad social organiza 
tion is false belief. 

We ought to pay great attention to our public 
affairs; we should be ready to modify our opinions, 
to renounce our former ones, and to thoroughly 
understand the new. We should cast off our prej 
udices and should reason with an entirely free 
mind. The sailor who keeps the sail set in the same 
direction in spite of the changing of the wind will 
never reach port. 

(Henry George.) 

It is only necessary to adopt frankly the doc 
trine of Christ in order to perceive at once the 
horrible lie in which each and every one of us is 
living. 

(Daily Reading, January.) 

The Christian doctrine, the real significance of 
which we are grasping more and more, teaches that 
man's mission is to manifest ever better and better 
the Rule of all; and it is love that proves the pres 
ence of this Rule in us. That is why the highest 
law that should guide us is love. 

34 



The Law of Violence 35 

All the ancient religions recognize that love is 
the essential condition for a happy existence. The 
sages of Egypt, the Brahmans, the Stoics, the Bud 
dhists, etc. declared the principal virtues to be 
kindness, pity, compassion, and charity; in one 
word, love in all its forms. The highest of these 
doctrines, especially those of Buddha and of Tao- 
Tse, went as far as recommending love to every 
human being, and for people to return good for evil. 

However, none of them placed this virtue as a 
supreme law that should be the only motive of our 
acts. This was the distinctive trait of the most 
recent religion, that of Christ. All previous doc 
trines proclaimed the love of one's neighbor as one 
of the virtues; the doctrine of Christ is based on the 
metaphysical principle of love, the supreme law, 
that should guide us in our daily life and which 
admits of no exception. 

Christ's teaching should not be considered as 
entirely new, standing out distinctly from former 
beliefs, it is only the clearer and more precise 
expression of the principle that previous religions 
divined and taught instinctively. Thus it is that 
instead of love being merely one of the virtues, as 
it was for them, Christianity has made it a supreme 
law, giving man an absolute rule of conduct. The 
Christian doctrine explains why this law is the 
highest, and indicates as well the acts that man 



36 The Law of Love 

should or should not commit after having acknowl 
edged the truth of this teaching. It follows, with 
great clearness and precision, that the observance 
of the supreme law, and because it is supreme, 
should not admit of any exception as the previous 
doctrines admitted and that love is love, when it 
is given in the same degree to other nations, other 
religions, and even to the enemies who hate us and 
do us harm. 

That is the progress made by the Christian doc 
trines, and there lies its principal virtue. 

The explanation of why this commandment is 
the supreme law of life is given with special clear 
ness in the Epistles of John: 

"Beloved, let us love one another: for love is of God; 
and every one that loveth is begotten of God, and 
knoweth God. He that loveth not knoweth not God; for 
God is love. No man hath beheld God at any time: if we 
love one another God abideth in us, and his love is per 
fected in us. God is love; and he that abideth in love 
abideth in God, and God abideth in him. 

"We know that we have passed out of death into life, 
because we love the brethren. He that loveth not abideth 
in death." 

(The First Epistle of John, iv, 7, 8, 12, 16; Hi, 14.) 

According to this doctrine our ego, our life, is 
the divine principle limited by our body, and which 



The Law of Violence 37 

manifests itself in us by love; it is why the true life 
of each of us is the manifestation of love. 

How we should interpret this conception of 
the law of love in our acts, has been indicated to 
us in the Scriptures on numerous occasions, and 
with special clearness and precision in the fourth 
commandment of the Sermon on the Mount. 

"Ye have heard that it was said: An eye for an eye, and 
a tooth for a tooth (Exodus, 21, 14) : but I say unto you, 
Resist not him that is evil." 

(Matthew, v, 38.) 

Foreseeing, no doubt, the exceptions that would 
appear inevitable when the law of love is applied, 
the verses 39 and 40 of the same chapter state 
clearly that no circumstances whatever should arise 
that could permit any deviation from the strict 
commandment of love: Do not do unto others 
what you would not have them do unto you. 

And it is said: "Whosoever smiteth thee on thy right 
cheek, turn to him the other also; and if any man would 
go to law with thee, and take away thy coat, let him have 
thy cloak also/* 

In other words, this means that violence directed 
against you does not justify the use of violence by 
you. 

The same condemnation of our breaking the law 



38 The Laiv of Love 

of love, when we feel justified by the attitude of 
others, is even more clearly indicated in the last 
commandment of the Sermon on the Mount: 

"Ye have heard that it was said, Thou shall love thy 
neighbor, and hate thine enemy: (Lev. xix, 17, 18.) but 
I say unto you, Love your enemies, and pray for them that 
persecute you; that ye may be sons of your father who is 
in Heaven; for he maketh his son to rise on the evil and 
the good, and sendeth rain on the just and unjust. For if 
ye love them that love you, what reward have ye? Do not 
even the publicans the same? And if ye salute your breth 
ren only, what do ye more than others? do not even the 
publicans the same? Ye therefore shall be perfect, as your 
heavenly Father is perfect." 

(Matthew v, 43-48.) 

And it is this law of love and its recognition as a 
rule of conduct in all our relations with friends, 
enemies, offenders, etc. which inevitably brings 
about the complete transformation of the existing 
order of things, and does this not only among 
Christian nations, but among all the populations of 
the globe. 

And this is also the essential difference between 
the Christian doctrine in its true conception and 
previous religions; this is the progress that has been 
accomplished in the universal conscience. 

The previous religious and moral doctrines that 
acknowledged the benefit of love in human life 



The Law of Violence 



admitted, however, certain circumstances in which 
the realization of this law cannot be obligatory. 
Also, as soon as it ceases to be a changeless law, its 
beneficence disappears and the doctrine of love is 
reduced to fruitless teaching, not modifying in any 
way the mode of living that is founded on violence. 
On the other hand, the true Christian doctrine, 
making of the law of love a rule without exceptions, 
in the same way abolishes the possibility of any 
violence, and cannot, in consequence, help but 
condemn every state founded on violence. 

It is just this signification of Christianity that 
was hidden from men by false Christianity, because 
the latter acknowledges love not as a higher law, 
but, with the example of previous doctrines, only 
as one of the rules of conduct, useful for observance 
when circumstances do not prevent. 



VIII 



The disasters caused by wars and military pre 
parations not only surpass in horror the motives 
that provoke them, and by which one seeks to 
justify them, but these motives themselves are 
often ignored by the victims of the war. 

(Daily Reading, June 17th.) 

Men are so accustomed to see order maintained 
by the aid of force, that they cannot imagine a 
social organization without restraint. 

The organizers of a reign of justice founded on 
violence should know what justice is and should 
be just themselves. And if some can know what 
is just, and be just, why should other men not 
know, and why should not they, as well, be just? 
(Daily Reading, August 14th.) 

If men were absolutely virtuous, they would 
never move an inch from the truth. 

The truth is harmful to the one who does evil. 
Whoever does good, loves truth. 

(Daily Reading, August 29th.) 

Reason is frequently the slave of sin; it strives 
to justify it. 

(Daily Reading, August 29th.) 

40 



The Law of Violence 41 

I am often astonished to see men defend certain 
strange maxims, whether religious, political or 
scientific. Seek and you will find what is necessary 
to defend your position. 

(Daily Reading, May 27th.) 

The true Christian doctrine consists only in the 
recognition of love as the supreme law of life, not 
admitting, consequently, of any exception. This 
means that the pretended Christian doctrine which 
does admit of exceptions, such as the possibility of 
the use of violence in the enforcement of laws, is a 
contradiction as obvious as cold fire, or warm ice. 

It seems natural that if the possibility is once 
admitted that men may torture or kill their fellow 
beings in the name of humanity, others may claim 
the same right to torture and kill in the name of 
some ideal of the future. The admission of a single 
case contrary to the law of love destroys all its 
beneficent characteristics, although it is the basis of 
all religious or moral doctrines. This seems so self- 
evident that one hesitates to be obliged to prove it; 
nevertheless, the believers or the nonbelievers of 
the Christian world, the latter acknowledge the 
moral law look upon the doctrine of love con 
demning violence as fantastic and inapplicable to 
life. 

We can see that governments insist that good 
order cannot be maintained without violence, 



42 The Law of Love 

really meaning by the word "order" the mainte 
nance of a government that permits a minority to 
profit as much as it likes by the work of the 
majority. We can see why they say it, for the sup 
pression of violence would take away their means 
of continuing their present existence and would 
denounce its iniquity of long standing. 

This ought not to be the case for the mass of 
workers who employ violence on each other and 
who suffer from it so cruelly. The situation of the 
oppressed should not be compared to the constraint 
used directly by the stronger on the weaker, or by a 
greater number on a smaller. Here, indeed, it is the 
minority who oppress the majority, thanks to a lie 
established ages ago by clever people, in virtue of 
which men despoil each other, for insignificant 
profits, of much greater advantages such as liberty 
and are exposed to painful suffering. 

The origin of this lie was discovered four cen 
turies ago by the French writer La Boetie, in his 
work, Voluntary Slavery. He said: 

"It is not bands of horsemen, it is not companies 
of infantry, or is it arms that defend the tyrant; 
but, true as it is, it will not at first be believed, there 
are always four or five who control the tyrant, four 
or five who hold the country in servitude for him. 
There are always five or six who have access to the 
tyrant, and who have offered themselves, or are 



The Law of Violence 



called upon by him, to be accomplices of his 
cruelty, the companions of his pleasures, pandors to 
his lust, and sharers in his pillage. These six train 
their chief so well that he must be wicked not only 
as the result of his own brutality, but of theirs, 
also. These six have six hundred who profit 
under them, and they act towards them as the six 
act towards the tyrant. These six hundred have 
under them six thousand whom they have raised in 
degree, to whom they have given, even if indirectly, 
the government of provinces or the handling of 
taxes, that they may control their avarice and 
cruelty. They perform their duties when it seems 
good to them, and also do so much evil, that they 
could not exist except under protection, nor be 
dispensed with, except by means of law and punish 
ment. 

"Great are the consequences that result from 
this. And any one who looked closer into this net 
would be interested in seeing that not only the six 
thousand, but hundreds of thousands, millions, hold 
the tyrant by this cord, helping themselves by 
means of it. The way, in Homer, Jupiter boasts 
that if he pulls a chain he will draw all the gods to 
him. From this came the rise of the senate, the 
establishment of new states, the election of offices; 
not certainly to reform justice, but to keep the 
tyrant in power. 



44 The Law of Love 

"To sum up, we owe our present condition to 
the favors, to the gains and advantages that one 
acquires together with the tyrants, who find as 
many people to whom tyranny seems profitable, as 
those to whom liberty would be agreeable. If 
physicians say there is something the matter with 
one part of our body, although the rest is quite 
well, they come at once to the infected part. In the 
same way, as soon as a king is declared a tyrant, all 
the wicked, all the dregs of the kingdom (I do not 
say a lot of robbers and cheats who can do neither 
evil nor good in a republic, but those who are filled 
with ardent ambition and extraordinary avarice) , 
gather around him and uphold him in order to 
share in the booty and to be petty tyrants under 
the great tyrant. 

"Thus act the great thieves and the famous cor 
sairs; some discover countries, others rob travellers; 
some are in ambush, others lie in wait; some assas 
sinate, others despoil; and even here there are 
degrees, and while some are only servants, others 
are the chiefs of the group, although one and all 
share in the booty, or at least in the search for it. 
They say that the Sicilian pirates assembled in such 
great numbers that Pompey the Great had to be 
sent against them; but they allied themselves with 
several splendid cities and towns, in whose harbors 
they could hide with great security when they 



The Law of Violence 45 

returned from their raids; and for recompense they 
allowed these towns a certain percentage of their 
pillage. 

"Thus the tyrant enslaved his subjects, some by 
the help of others, and was protected by those from 
whom, if they were worth nothing, he should him 
self have been protected; but, as one says, to cut 
wood, one must have wedges of the same kind of 
wood: there are the archers, there is the guard, 
there are the halberders. Not that they do not 
suffer occasionally on his account: but these lost 
sheep, these people abandoned by God and man, are 
content to endure evil in order to commit it in 
their turn, not on those who inflict it on them, but 
on those who suffer from it like themselves, and 
who are unable to commit it." 

It would seem that the workers, not gaining any 
advantage from the restraint that is exercised on 
them, should at last realize the lie in which they 
are living and free themselves in the simplest and 
easiest way: by abstaining from taking part in the 
violence that is only possible with their co-opera 
tion. 

It would be so simple and so natural to make 
the agricultural laborers, who are in the majority 
in Russia and other countries, understand that for 
centuries they have been suffering by their own 
fault and without any advantage: that the ex- 



46 The Law of Love 

elusive possession of the land is assured by those 
who do not work it themselves, guards, police 
agents, soldiers; that all the taxes are imposed 
by them, inasmuch as they are employed by the 
exchequer; and, when they have at last understood, 
to get them to say to those they consider as chiefs: 

"Leave us alone. If you, emperors, generals, 
judges, bishops, professors and other learned men, 
if you have need of armies, navies, universities, 
corps de ballet, ecclesiastic courts, conservatories 
of music, prisons, gallows, guillotines, prepare 
them all yourselves; tax yourselves, judge your 
selves, imprison and execute each other, exter 
minate yourselves, get yourselves killed in war; but 
leave us alone, for we have no need of all these 
things and we do not wish to participate in acts 
that are futile as far as we are concerned, and 
above all, so wicked." 

Nothing should be more natural than that the 
working class should thus express itself. But part of 
them, the majority, continue their existence of 
martyrs in the police service, in financial offices, 
in the regiments; others, the minority, in trying to 
free themselves from oppression by revolt and by, 
in their turn, committing violence on those who 
oppress them; or, in other words, in trying to 
quench fire by fire and thus increasing the violence 
from which they are suffering. 



The Law of Violence 47 

Why do men act so irrationally? 

It is because the long duration of the lie has 
caused them to lose all notion of the bond that 
exists between their servitude and their participa 
tion in violence. 

Why do they not see this bond? 

Because they no longer have faith; and without 
faith, men are guided only by interest. In fact, he 
who is guided by interest alone cannot do otherwise 
than deceive or be deceived. 

The result is a surprising phenomenon: the masses 
of the working class, the great majority, not 
only continue to support violence, but even main 
tain it, contrary to common sense, and to their 
evident interest; in spite of very frequent denun 
ciations of the iniquity from which they are suffer 
ing; in spite of revolutions for the purpose of 
suppressing violence by violence. 

All these workers continue, by habit, either to 
profess the false Christian doctrine taught by the 
Church, or to deny all religion, but they believe in 
the bottom of their hearts in the ancient law of 
"a tooth for a tooth/' submitting to the detested 
government, or else seeking to destroy it by violence. 

Part of them are powerless to change their situa 
tion because, believing in the necessity of the 
present social organization, they cannot refrain 



48 The Law of Love 

from participating in its violence; the rest, whose 
religion has been replaced by political doctrines, 
cannot free themselves from violence, because they 
are forced to suppress it by violence of another sort. 



IX 



The savage instinct of military murder has been 
so carefully cultivated for thousands of years, that 
it has become deeply rooted in the human brain. 
It is to be hoped, however, that a better humanity 
will be able to free itself from this horrible crime. 
But what will this better humanity think of the 
so-called refined civilization of which we are so 
proud? The same that we think of the ancient 
inhabitants of Mexico and of their cannibalism* 
people warlike, pious and bestial at the same time. 

(Letourneau,) 

War will disappear only when men shall take 

no part whatever in violence and shall be ready 

to suffer every persecution that their abstention 

will bring them. It is the only way to abolish war. 

(Anatole France. Daily Reading, 

December 29th*) 

Ask the majority of Christians what they con 
sider the greatest evil from which Christ freed 
humanity, and they will answer: from Hell, ever 
lasting fire, and punishment in the next world. 
And according to this idea, they believe that our 
salvation may be obtained thanks to the interven 
tion of others. The word Hell, which is seen so 

49 



50 The Law of Love 

seldom In the Scriptures, has done much harm to 
Christianity on account of false interpretation. 
Men flee from an external Hell, when in reality 
they carry within themselves the Hell that they 
should fear the most. The salvation that they 
need, that frees them, is the liberation of their 
souls from the evil that is concealed within them. 

Much worse than external punishment is the 
soul in a state of rebellion against God, is the soul 
endowed with divine force and abandoning itself 
to bestial passions; is the soul living in the sight 
of God and fearing the anger of men, preferring 
glory in men's eyes to the peaceful realization of 
his virtue. There is no greater disaster than that. 

It is this that impenitent man carries with him 
to his grave. 

To gain salvation in the highest interpretation, 
of this word, is to lift up the weary spirit, cure 
the suffering soul, give it back its liberty of 
thought, of conscience, of love. In doing this one 
finds the salvation for which Christ died; it is for 
this salvation that the Holy Ghost was given to 
us, it is towards this salvation that the true Chris 
tian doctrine is discovering the right road. 

(Channing.) 

It seems so easy to tell the truth; yet it takes 
a great deal of effort within ourselves to attain 
this virtue. 

A man's degree of veracity indicates the degree 
of his moral perfection. 

(Daily Reading, September 19th,) 



The Law of Violence 51 

The condition of the Christian world indicated 
in the preceding chapter, as well as that of the rest 
of the inhabitants of the earth, remains the same 
as has been described. But I believe that the 
moment has come, for Russians above all, and for 
the moujiks in particular, to see at last where lie 
the means of salvation. 

I believe that the Russians are summoned first to 
this task because they are less civilized than the 
other nations; that is to say, less corrupt intel 
lectually, and they have kept a vague, but pro 
found understanding of the Christian religion; 
they are summoned to-day precisely because they 
have just gone through an irregular, lamentable 
revolution and a repression horrible in its extra 
ordinary insolent and stupid cruelty* 

The means of salvation of which I am speaking 
has been foreseen by men for a long time, but it is 
only lately that they are becoming conscious of it 
and are beginning to apply it. 

A military court is sitting in a Russian town. 
The judges are seated before a table; on this table 
are the mirror of justice, surmounted by the two 
headed imperial eagle and carrying an inscription 
on its base; law books and sheets of paper with 
underlined headings. 

Among the judges, in the place of honor, is seated 
a stout man in uniform, with a cross at his collar; 



J2 The Law of Love 

he seems rather intelligent, good-natured, also, even 
tenderhearted because he has lunched well, and has 
received comforting news about his youngest son's 
health. At his side is another officer, of German 
origin, who is displeased at having been appointed, 
and is going over in his head the terms of the report 
that he is about to address to his chief. The third 
place is occupied by a very young officer, smart, 
good-humored, still thinking of the epigram that 
he ventured to make while lunching at the colonel's, 
and which amused the guests so much. He is still 
smiling about it. He is frantically anxious to smoke, 
and is impatiently awaiting the end of th'e sitting. 

At a short distance the registrar is sitting in front 
of a small table. He is absorbed in the arrangement 
of a bundle of papers, among which he will choose 
the documents to be asked for presently at the first 
injunction. 

Two young people, one a peasant from the gov 
ernment of Panza, the other a merchant in a small 
way from the town of Lubin, are both dressed as 
troopers. A third is brought in, dressed like the 
others and quite young. 

This young man is very pale. He casts a rapid 
glance at the court, then his eyes take on a vague 
expression. He has passed three years in prison for 
having refused to take the oath for military service. 
In order to get rid of him, after three years of 



The Law of Violence 53 

prison, he has been offered an opportunity to swear 
allegiance, after which he could be set at liberty as 
having served three years, although he passed them 
in prison. But he has again refused, declaring, as he 
did the first time, that he was a Christian, that he 
could not possibly swear an oath of allegiance, or 
become a murderer. 

The registrar reads a paper called the act of 
accusation. It is noted that the young man has 
refused to touch the pay and considers that military 
service is a sin. 

The president good-naturedly asks the accused if 
he is guilty. 

"Everything that has been read is exact: I acted 
and spoke like that, but I do not consider myself 
guilty," answers the young man in a voice trem 
bling with emotion. 

The president nods his head in assent, as if the 
reply was what he expected it to be; he consults a 
paper and asks: 

"What do you say in explanation of your con 
duct?" 

"I have refused and I still refuse because I con 
sider military service a sin ... contrary to the 
teaching of Christ." 

The president, satisfied, nods again in approval: 
everything is in order. 

"Have you anything to add ? " 



54 The Law of Love 

The young man explains with trembling lips 
that it is written in the Scriptures that murder is 
forbidden, and not only murder, even any hostile 
feeling towards one's neighbor. 

The president keeps on approving. The German 
officer frowns; the young officer, head and eye 
brows raised, becomes attentive as if he were hear 
ing something new and interesting. 

The accused, becoming more and more agitated, 
says that the oath is positively forbidden, and that 
he would consider himself guilty if had consented 
to serve, that he was again ready . . . 

This time the president stops him, finding that 
the accused is digressing and making futile remarks. 

The witnesses are called: the colonel of the 
regiment and the sergeant. The colonel is the 
president's usual partner at cards and is a past 
master in that exercise. The sergeant is a Pole 
belonging to the minor nobility, clever, handsome, 
and a great reader of fiction. 

Then in comes the priest, rather elderly. He has 
just left his daughter, son-in-law and grandchil 
dren, who have come to visit him, and he is still 
under the influence of a quarrel with his wife on 
account of a carpet that he has given his daughter, 
against her express wish. 

"Father, please swear in the witnesses, and tell 
them the sin they will commit against God by not 



The Law of Violence 



telling all the truth," says the president, addressing 
the priest. 

The latter puts on his vestment, takes the cross 
and the Bible, then pronounces the usual exhorta 
tion. 

The colonel is the first to take the oath; raising 
rapidly two very clean fingers, so well known to 
the president, he repeats after the priest the for 
mula of the oath, and kisses the cross and Bible 
noisily, as if the act gave him pleasure. 

Then it is the turn of the Catholic priest to 
swear in the young sergeant just as quickly. 

The judges, grave and calm, wait. The young 
officer, who had gone out for a minute to take a few 
puffs of a cigarette, comes back during the deposi 
tion of the witnesses. The latter testify, confirming 
what the accused has said. The president nods 
approvingly. 

After this an officer placed at a certain distance 
from the judges gets up; the speaker for the 
defense. He approaches the desk, takes up the 
papers lying there, and begins to speak in a loud 
voice, setting forth in lengthy periods everything 
that the young man has done, which the judges 
know already, and which the accused has just ad 
mitted, without trying to minimize his crime, but 
rather aggravating it. 

The accuser announces that, according to the 



56 The Law of Love 

young man's own declaration, he does not belong 
to any sect, that his parents are orthodox, and that, 
to begin with, his refusal to serve was only unwill 
ingness. This obstinacy, not only of the accused, 
but of others like him, obliged the government to 
take the severest measures against them, applicable 
as well in the present case. 

Then it is the turn of the defender, whose speech 
seems to have little connection with the affair. 

Then every one goes out, comes back, causes the 
accused to come back, and the Court appears. The 
judges first sit down, then get up, and the president, 
without looking at the accused, reads the sentence 
in a quiet, even voice: the accused, who has already 
suffered three years for not being a soldier, is con 
demned: first to be dismissed from the army and 
deprived of all his rights and privileges; secondly, 
to four years of prison. 

The guard takes out the young man; then all 
those who took part in the ceremony return to 
their occupations and habitual distractions, as if 
nothing in particular had happened. 

Except that the young officer, great smoker, 
feels a strange twinge of uneasiness, which recurs 
each time he thinks of the strong, noble words of 
the accused, said with so much emotion. During 
the deliberation the young officer had a fancy to 
express a contrary opinion to the decision of his 



The Law of Violence 57 

elders, but he was embarrassed, so he swallowed 
hastily and agreed. 

That evening, at the home of the colonel of the 
regiment, between two games of cards, when all 
the guests were seated around the tea table, they 
began to speak of the case of the refractory soldier. 
The colonel expressed his opinion frankly that lack 
of instruction was the cause of such incidents; one 
assimilates all kinds of ideas without adapting them 
to circumstances, and that leads to all sorts of ex 
travagances. 

"Pardon me, uncle," said a student, a social 
democrat, and the colonel's niece. "The strong 
opinions and the energy of this man are worthy of 
respect. One should only regret that this force has 
taken a wrong direction/* added the young girl, 
thinking how such energy would be valuable if 
used in the service of socialist ideas, instead of being 
wasted in out-of-date religious whims. 

"Come, you are a mad revolutionary," said her 
uncle, with a smile. 

The young officer, cigarette in mouth, inter 
vened in his turn: 

"Yet it seems to me that from the Christian 
point of view it would be difficult to contradict 
him/ 5 

"I don't know anything about any point of 
view," said a general severely. "But I do know that 



5j8 The Law of Love 

a soldier should be a soldier, and not a preacher." 

"In my opinion," said the president of the 
tribunal, his eyes twinkling, "The most important 
thing of all is not to lose time if we want to finish 
our game." 

"If any of you want more tea, you will be served 
at the card table," said the master of the house 
amiably, while one of the players, in a practical 
manner, threw the cards fanshape on the table. 
Each one took his place. 

In the prison entry, where the soldiers who were 
guarding the prisoner were waiting with him for 
their orders, another conversation took place: 

"How is it that the priest does not understand 
what is said exactly in the books?" asked one of the 
soldiers with an Ukrainian accent. 

"Naturally he doesn't understand, "answered the 
prisoner. "Or he woud have said as I do: Christ 
commands us to love and not to kill." 

"That is true, but very difficult." 

"It is not at all difficult. Just see, I have been 
locked up, and I am going to be locked up again; 
but I have such a light heart that I wish you all had 
the same/* 

A middle-aged noncommissioned officer drew 
near, and addressing the prisoner, said to him 
respectfully: 

"Well, Seminitch, you've been condemned?" 



___ The Law of Violence 59 

"Yes, of course." 

The noncommissioned officer shook his head, 
and added: 

"That is all very well, but one has to suffer 
for it." 

"It is necessary," answered the prisoner with a 
smile, visibly touched by this sympathy. 

"I know: Our Lord suffered and He told us to 
suffer also; but it is difficult, just the same." 

As he was speaking, the handsome Polish sergeant 
entered with a quick, authoritative step, and said 
briefly: 

"No conversation here. Put him in prison." 

The sergeant was especially severe, because he 
had received orders to see that the prisoner did not 
talk with the soldiers. In fact, during the time that 
this refractory youth had been in prison, four men 
had already been seduced by him; they had been 
court-martialled for refusing to serve, and were 
imprisoned in their turn. 



It is much more natural to conceive of a society 
directed and guided by rational ideas that are 
profitable to every one, than the society of the 
present day, where violence alone determines the 
conduct of men. 



It is likely that constraint, exercised by the 
state, was necessary in former days to assure the 
grouping of men; perhaps it is still necessary to 
day; but men can no longer close their eyes, or 
help feeling the state of things in which violence 
can only trouble their peaceful existence. It fol 
lows that in seeing it, or in feeling it, they cannot 
prevent themselves from seeking to realize this 
order of things. The means of realizing it is in the 
moral improvement of each one of us, and in 
abstention from any violence. 

(Daily Reading, October 13th.) 

The declarations made before the military judges 
by conscientious objectors are only repetitions of 
what has been said since the appearance of the 
Christian doctrine. The most ardent and sincere 

60 



The Law of Violence 61 

fathers of the Church declared the teaching of 
Christ to be incompatible with one of the funda 
mental conditions of the existence of the State: 
armed force; in other words, a Christian must not 
be a soldier, prepared to kill every one that he is 
ordered to do. 

The Christian communities of the first four cen 
turies declared categorically, from the mouths of 
their pastors, the prohibition of all murder, indi 
vidual or collective that is to say, war. 

The philosopher Tatian, converted to Christian 
ity in the second century, considered murder in 
warfare to be just as inadmissable for his co-reli 
gionists as any other kind of assassination, and 
looked upon the laurel crown of the victor as an 
unworthy symbol. In the same period Athinagorus 
of Athens says that not only must Christians not 
kill, but that they must not be witnesses of assas 
sinations. 

In the third century Clement of Alexandria con 
trasted warlike pagans with "the peaceful com 
munity of Christians." 

But it was Origen who most forcibly expressed 
the Christians* dislike of war. In applying the words 
of Isaiah to the Christians: the time would come 
when men would change their swords for sickles 
and their lances for ploughs, he says clearly: "We 
do not arm ourselves against any nation; we do not 



62 The Law of Love 

learn the art of war; because, through Jesus Christ, 
we have become the children of peace." Answering 
the accusation of Celsus against the Christians who 
avoided military service, (for, in his opinion, the 
Roman Empire would disappear as soon as it be 
came Christian) , Origen said that Christians fought 
more than the rest for the welfare of the emperor, 
since they defended him by good actions, by 
prayers and good influence on other men. As to 
armed combat, Origen added that he was certain 
that they would not take part with the imperial 
armies, or would they take part even if the emperor 
himself obliged them to do so. 

Tertullian, a contemporary of Origen, expressed 
himself as categorically on the impossibility of 
Christians being warriors. Speaking of military 
service he said: "It is not fitting to serve at the same 
time the symbol of Christ and the symbol of the 
devil, the power of light, and the power of darkness. 
One and the same soul cannot serve two masters. 
And how may we wage war without the sword 
that God himself has taken away from us? How 
can we learn the use of the sword, when Our Lord 
said that he who raised the sword would perish by 
the sword? And how can the sons of peace take 
part in combat?" 

The celebrated Cyprian in his turn said: "The 
world is going mad in mutual extermination, and 



The Law of Violence 63 

murder, considered as a crime when committed 
individually, becomes a virtue when it is committed 
by large numbers. It is the multiplication of the 
frenzy that assures impunity to the assassins." 

In the fourth century Lactance declared the 
same thing: "There cannot be a thousand excep 
tions to God's commandment: Thou shalt not kill. 
No arm save truth should be carried by Christians." 

The rules of the Church of Egypt in the third 
century, as well as the Testament of Our Lord 
Jesus Christ^ absolutely forbid any Christian to 
serve in the army, under pain of excommunication. 

In the Acts of the Saints, there are many exam 
ples of martyrdom suffered by the faithful of 
Christ for having refused to serve. For example, 
Maximilian who, brought before the conscription 
council and asked to give his name to the proconsul, 
answered: "I am called a Christian, and conse 
quently am not a warrior." He was delivered to the 
executioner. 

Marcellus was a centurian in the Legion of Troy. 
Having embraced the Christian doctrine, and 
being convinced that war was an impious act, he 
took off his armor before the whole legion, threw 
it on the ground, and declared that having become 
a Christian he could no longer remain in the army. 
He was imprisoned, but again he repeated: "A 
Christian must not carry arms." He was executed. 



64 The Law of Love 

Cassius likewise confessed to the same religion 
and refused to serve. He suffered a similar fate. 

Under Julian the Apostate, Martin, brought up 
in a military atmosphere, refused to continue his 
service. During the examination that the emperor 
made him undergo he only answered with these 
words: 

"I am a Christian and therefore am not a 
warrior." 

In the year 325, the first general council insti 
tuted a severe penance for Christians who went 
back to the army after having left it. Here are the 
exact terms of this order in the Russian transla 
tion, recognized by the Orthodox Church: 1 

"Called by the grace of the profession of faith 
and having shown their first ardor in removing 
their warlike accouterments, then having returned 
to them, like dogs towards their vomitings, . . . 
they should implore the Church for a period of ten 
years; asking pardon, listening to the Scriptures, 
for three years on the threshold of the Church/' 

Christians, enrolled for the first time in the army, 
were instructed not to kill their enemies during war. 
In the fourth century Basil the Great recommended 
that soldiers who had infringed this rule should not 
be admitted to the Communion for three years. 

1 The English translation above is taken from the French translation 
from the Russian of the Orthodox Church. (Translator's note.) 



The Law of Violence 



One sees that the conviction that war is incom 
patible with Christianity was in force not only 
during the first three centuries, during which time 
Christians were persecuted, but even at the mo 
ment of their triumph over paganism, when their 
doctrine was recognized as the State religion. 

Ferrucius declared it very clearly and paid for 
it with his life. "He forbade Christians to shed 
blood, even in a just war and under the orders of 
Christian sovereigns." 

In the fourth century Lucifer, Bishop of Calaris, 
professed that the Christians should defend their 
greatest possession, faith, not in killing, but in 
sacrificing their own lives. 

Paulin, Bishop of Nole, who died in the year 43 1, 
threatened eternal torment to those who served 
Caesar bearing arms. 

Thus it was during the first four centuries of 
Christianity. 

But under the reign of Constantin the standards 
of the Roman Legions were already carrying the 
cross. And in 416 an order was decreed with the 
result that pagans were not admitted to the army. 
All the soldiers had become Christians; or, in other 
words, all the Christians had, with few exceptions, 
denied Christ. 

Since then, and for about fifteen centuries, the 
simple and evident truth of the incompatibility of 



66 The Law of Love 

Christianity with the committing of all kinds of 
violence, assassination included, has been so hidden 
from men that generation after generation succeed 
each other, kill, participate in murders and profit 
by them, while professing the doctrine that con 
demns them. 

The crusades were a derision, and the most hor 
rible crimes were committed in the name of Chris 
tianity; so much so, that the few people who kept 
to the true principles of Christianity, not admitting 
any violence: the Montagnists, Albigeois, etc. were 
universally despised or persecuted. 

But, like fire, truth little by little consumes all 
the veils that hide it, and since the beginning of the 
last century it has sprung up with even increasing 
brightness by attracting attention in spite of every 
thing. 

This truth has often been manifested in Russia, 
especially in the beginning of the nineteenth cen 
tury. Its manifestations were doubtless many, but 
its traces have been effaced; a few only are known 
to us. 



XI 



True courage in the struggle cheers the man who 
knows that God is his ally. 

In the world ye have tribulation: but be of 
good cheer; I have overcome the world. 

(John, xvi, 33.) 

Do not wait for the realization of the divine 
work that you are serving; but know that not 
one of your efforts will be useless, but will hasten 
the hour. 

(Daily Reading, May 24th.) 

The most important acts, both for the one who 
accomplishes them and for his fellow creatures, 
are those that have remote consequences. 

(Daily Reading, May 28th.) 

A governor-in-chief of the Caucasus, Mouraviev, 
noted the following in his private diary: 

In 1 8 1 8 five serfs of the Government of Tambov 
who had refused to serve in the army were sent 
away from the Caucasus. On several occasions they 
were made to suffer the "bastonade," a torture that 
consisted in making them pass between two rows 
of troops, each soldier in turn striking the victim. 

67 



6S The Law of Love 

But it did no good. The defaulting recruits re 
peated: "All men are equal; our sovereign is a man 
like us; we will not obey him, we will not pay taxes, 
and above all, we will not kill men, our brothers, 
in war. You may cut us up into pieces, we will not 
yield: we will not wear the uniform, we will not 
eat at the mess, we will not be soldiers. We will 
contribute our pennies if you like, but we do not 
wish to receive any of the State money." 

These men and others like them were bastonaded 
until they were left to die; they rotted in the 
prison, and nothing more was said about them. 
But their number increased, just the same, during 
the last century. 

For example, they say that in 1827 two soldiers 
of the guard, Nicolaiev and Boddanov, fled into a 
hermitage of the sect of old believers, installed in 
the middle of a forest by the merchant Sokolov. 
When captured, they refused to serve again or to 
take the oath, because it was contrary to their con 
viction. The chiefs decided to put them to the 
torture of the bastonade between two rows of sol 
diers, and then they were placed in disciplinary 
companies. 

M. Koltchine 1 wrote that: "In 1830, a man and 
a woman were arrested in the Government of 
Yaroslav. At their examination the man said that 



1 The Deported and the Prisoners of the Convent of SolovkJ. 



. The Law of Violence 69 

he was named Egor Ivanov, aged 65 years, but that 
he did not know who he was. He had never had 
any other father, he said, than Christ the Saviour. 
The woman made the same declaration. 

"During the exhortation made by the priest 
before the court, the two accused added that they 
had on earth no other czar than the one in Heaven; 
that they recognized no emperor, nor any civil or 
religious authorities. On another occasion Egor 
Ivanov, then aged 70 years, repeated that he did not 
recognize any of the authorities, and that he con 
sidered that they had all digressed from the rules 
of the Christian religion. He was exiled to the 
monastery of Solovki to be employed in the works 
there; but he was shut up, no one knows why, and 
he remained there until his death. He kept firmly 
to the position he had taken. 

"In 1835 an unknown man calling himself only 
Ivan was arrested in the Government of Yaroslav. 
He declared that he did not recognize the saints, the 
emperor, nor any authority. He was exiled by order 
of the emperor to Solovki to be employed in the 
fields. In the same year he was transferred to the 
army, also by imperial order. 

A recruit of the Government of Moscow, Ivan 
Schouroupov, aged nineteen, refused, in 1849, to 
take the oath of allegiance, in spite of all the pun 
ishments incurred. As the motive for his refusal he 



70 The Law of Love 

gave the Word of God, which commands that God 
alone shall be served. That is why he did not wish 
to serve the emperor, or to take the oath of 
allegiance, for fear of committing perjury. The 
military authorities, fearing the bad effect that this 
would have on the others, decided to imprison 
Schouroupov in the monastery without trial. Em 
peror Nicholas I inscribed the following resolution 
on the report of the affair that was presented to 
him: Banish the said recruit to the Monastery of 
Solovki." 

This is the information recorded in the press 
relative to some isolated cases constituting evidently 
one in a thousand of all those who, in Russia, have 
recognized the impossibility of professing Chris 
tianity and at the same time obeying the public 
authorities. 

As to entire communities, counting thousands of 
members and moved by the same faith, they were 
very numerous in the last century and still are 
to-day. I shall mention the Molokanes, Jehovists, 
Khlisti, Skoptsi, the old believers, and many others, 
who generally dissemble their denial of govern 
mental authority, but consider it as the element of 
every evil, and as being diabolic. 

It was above all the Doukhobors, who, number 
ing several tens of thousands, forcibly denied all 
public powers. Several thousands of these Doukho- 



The Law of Violence 71 

bors remained firm in their conviction, in spite of 
all the persecutions to which they were exposed. 
They were finally exiled to Canada. 

The number of defaulting recruits increased 
more and more. From the time that our govern 
ment instituted universal military service the 
refusal of true Christians multiplied still more. No 
persecution, no punishment stopped these young 
people from what they considered disobedience to 
Divine law. 

By chance I have known quite a number of these 
men who have suffered painfully for their faith in 
Russia, and many of whom are still detained in 
prison. Here are the names of some of the victims: 
Zalubovsky, Lubitch, Mokeiev, Drojjine, Izum- 
chenko, Olkhovik, Sereda, Farafonov, Egorov, 
Gancha, Akoulov, Chaga, Dimchitz, Ivanenko, 
Bezverkhi, Slobudnuk, Mironov, Bougaiev, Cheli- 
chev, Menchikov, Reznikov, Rojkov, Chevchook, 
Bourov, Goncharenko, Zakharov, Tregoubov, Vol- 
kov, Koschevoi. 

Among those who are imprisoned I know: Ikon- 
nikov, Kourtych, Varnavsky, Chniakine, Molossai, 
Koudrine, Pantchikov, Deriabine, Kalatchev, Ban- 
nov, Zinkitchev, Martchenko, Prozretsky, Davi- 
dov. 

I know others in Austria, in Hungary, Serbia, 
Bulgaria, Holland, France, Switzerland, Sweden, 



72 The Law of Love 

Belgium. Better still, these refusals to serve in the 
army have taken place lately and for the same 
motives in the Mussulman world, notable among 
the Babides, in Persia, and in the sect of the Legion 
of God in Russia. 

The motive for these refusals is always the same, 
as natural, necessary and incontrovertible: recogni 
tion of the necessity of observing the religious law 
rather than the civil one, when these are in opposi 
tion. But a civil law exacting military service, that 
is to say, the command to kill by order of the chiefs, 
can only be in opposition to every religious and 
moral law founded on the love of one's neighbor. 
It is the case for all religious doctrines, Christian 
as well as Mohammedan, Buddhist, Brahman and 
Confucianist. 

The definition of the law of love given nineteen 
centuries ago by Christ has in our days penetrated 
the consciousness of men, no longer by the observ 
ance of Christ's teaching, but directly, among all 
those in whom the moral sense is developed. 

Here, and only here is our salvation. 

It would seem at first sight that the refusals to 
serve in the army are only isolated cases. But one 
forgets that these are not occasional acts, deter 
mined by certain circumstances; they are the re 
sult of sincere professions of religious doctrines. 

It is evident, then, that this faith ruins everything 



The Law of Violence 73. 

that is based on principles contrary to it. Indeed, as 
soon as men understand that their participation in 
violence is incompatible with the Christianity that 
they profess; as soon as they refuse to serve as 
soldiers, tax collectors, judges, jury, police agents, 
the acts of violence from which the whole world 
is suffering, will disappear immediately. 



XII 



When you can say with entire truth and with 
a whole heart: "Lord God, lead me wherever thou 
desirest," then, only, do you deliver yourself from 
servitude and become really free. 

(Thoughts of the Wise, April 14th.) 1 

A free man is only master of what he can dis 
pose of without hindrance. But one cannot dispose 
entirely of oneself. That is why, when you see that 
a man wishes to dispose not of himself, but of 
others, know that he is not free: he has become the 
slave of his desire to dominate men. 

(Epictetus. Thoughts of the 'Wise, June llth.) 

What can these hundreds, these thousands say if 
you like, these hundreds of thousands of men 
feeble, powerless, isolated, do in the presence of a 
considerable number of other men, docile to the 
government's orders and provided with the most 
formidable arms of destruction? Does not the 
struggle seem unequal, impossible? 

Nevertheless, the result of this struggle is as 



1 Another collection of Tolstoy, made before Daily Reading, 

74 



The Law of Violence 75 

little in doubt as is the struggle between the shades 
of night and the light of dawn. 

Here is what was written by one of these young 
men who was imprisoned for having refused to 
serve in the army: 

"Sometimes I am able to speak with soldiers of 
the guard, and I cannot help smiling when they say 
to me: 

'Come, my lad, it can't be very easy for you 
to spend all the years of your youth in prison/ 

'Doesn't it all end the same way?' I say. 

'That's true, but you wouldn't be so badly off in 
the regiment, if you wished to serve/ 

'I am better off here than the rest of you in the 
regiment/ 

"And they answer: 

'That is true. But just the same, here it is the 
fourth year that you have been imprisoned, while 
if you had done your military service, you would 
have been free long ago/ 

'But since I am all right here/ 

'That is odd,' mused the soldier, shaking his 
head, and looking pensive. 

"I have the same conversations with the soldiers 
imprisoned with me: 

'It is queer. You endure everything, and in spite 
of all, you are always gay and active,' one of them 
said to me, a soldier of Jewish origin. 



76 The Law of Love 

"My other prison comrades said when they saw 
any of their number become sad: 

Took here, you are scarcely shut up here before 
you pine away. Look at Daddy (that is what they 
call me on account of my beard) , he's been here 
for a long time, but he's always gay/ 

"And at times we have long conversations just 
for the sake of speaking; but sometimes in order to 
speak of God, of life, and of other interesting 
things. Or else one of my comrades speaks of his 
life in his village, and one feels so well, listening. 
In fact, I cannot complain of my existence here." 

Another writes: 

"I will not say that my mental life is always the 
same. I pass moments of lassitude as well as moments 
of joy. 

"At the present time I am feeling well. But just 
the same it takes a lot of strength to take part with 
a feeling of triumph in what goes on in prison. In 
order not to give way, I try to see into the depths 
of things, and to persuade myself that it is all 
momentary, that I have more force within me than 
is needed for whatever the case may be, and joy 
brightens my heart again, and wipes away every 
thing that has just happened. It is in this mental 
struggle that my existence is passing/* 

A third writes: 

"Sentence has been passed. I am condemned to 



The Law of Violence 77 

five years, five months, and six days of prison. You 
could never believe the joy and peace I felt after 
the judgement, as if I had been relieved of an 
enormous weight. I wish I could always feel as light 
and active." 

Quite different is the state of soul of those who 
participate in violence, submitting to it or profit 
ing by it. All these thousands, all these millions of 
men are ignorant of the very natural sentiment of 
love for one's neighbor; on the contrary, they hate, 
blame, or fear, suppressing all their human senti 
ments to such a point, that the assasination of their 
brothers seems the indispensable condition of their 
well-being. 

"You reproach us for the cruelty of the execu 
tions/ 5 say the Russian conservatives to-day. "But 
what shall we do with these wretches? In France 
they quieted the country only after cutting off 
innumerable heads. Let them stop throwing bombs, 
and we will stop hanging them/' 

With the same inhuman cruelty the leaders of 
the revolution insist upon the death of the leaders 
of the government. The revolutionaries, workmen 
from the factories or the fields, insist upon the 
death of the capitalists, the landed proprietors. 
These men know that their acts are contrary to 
human nature and they lie, seeking to arouse 
wickedness in themselves, in order to smother the 



78 The Law of Love 

truth that is in them, and they suffer from the 
most smarting evil, that of the soul. 

Some believe that they are impelled by human 
nature to accomplish the task towards which all 
humanity is tending, and which certainly results 
in good, as much to the individual as collectively; 
others, in spite of all their efforts to hide it from 
themselves, know that all their acts are contrary to 
our nature, and that they are sticking to a task 
from which humanity is constantly withdrawing, 
a task from which mankind is suffering, as well as 
each one of us, and they themselves more than any. 
On one side there are liberty, peace and sincerity; 
on the other, slavery, fear and dissimulation. On 
the one side is faith, on the other lack of belief; on 
one side truth, on the other lies; on one side love, 
on the other, hatred; on one side a radiant future, 
and on the other a frightful past. 

How can one doubt which side will be victorious? 

What irrefutable truths were expressed by a 
French writer, now dead, when he wrote this mar 
vellously inspired letter: 

"No matter what he does, no matter what he 
says, no matter what one says to him, man has only 
one body to nourish, one intelligence to cultivate 
and develop; he has one soul to satisfy. This soul is 
also working incessantly, in continual evolution 
towards the light and truth. As long as it will not 



^ The Law of Violence 7 

have received all the light, or conquered all the 
truth, it will torment him. 

Well, it has never worried him, never dominated 
him so much as in the present day. It is, as it were, 
in the air that one breathes. The individual souls 
who alone have had the will to undertake a social 
regeneration have been gradually sought out, called, 
approached, united and understood, and have 
formed a group, a centre of attraction towards 
which other souls now fly from the four quarters 
of the globe, as swallows towards a mirror. They 
more or less constitute, as one might say, a collective 
soul, in order that in future men may realize in 
common, the coming union and regular progress 
of nations who have recently been hostile to each 
other. I find and recognize this new soul in facts 
that seem the most likely to be denied. 

"This arming of all the nations, these threats 
that their representatives make to each other, this 
renewing of race persecution, these enmities among 
compatriots, and even the horseplay in the Sor- 
bonne are examples that have a bad appearance, but 
are not a bad augury. They are the last convulsions 
of what is going to disappear. The social body acts 
like the human body; the malady is only a violent 
effort of the organism to free itself from a morbid 
and harmful element. 

"Those who have profited, and who hope to go 



80 The Law of Love 

on profiting for a long time, by the errors of the 
past, will unite in order that nothing shall be 
changed. As a result, there are these arms, these 
threats, these persecutions; but if you will look 
closely you will see that all that is merely external. 
It is collosal and empty. The soul is not there; it 
has gone elsewhere; these millions of armed men, 
who are exercising every day in preparation for a 
general war of extermination, do not hate those 
that they must fight, and not one of their chiefs 
dares to declare this war. As to the claims, even the 
most serious ones, of those at the bottom, a great 
and sincere pity, which at last recognizes them as 
legitimate, is answering them from above. 

The entente is inevitable within a certain time, 
nearer than one supposes. I do not know if it is 
because I am going to leave this world soon, and if 
the glimmerings of light beyond the horizon have 
enlightened me also, affecting my sight, but I 
believe that our world is going to enter into the 
realization of the words: Love one another, with 
out bothering, either, whether it was a man or a 
God who said them.'* 1 

Yes, it is certainly in the practical realization of 
the law of love, in its true significance, that is to 
say, as a supreme law, admitting of no exception, 



1 Letter from A. Dumas fils to the director o the Gaitloh entitled 
Mysticism in School (Translator's note.) 



The Law of Violence 81 

in which is found the salvation from the horrible 
condition confronting the nations of the Christian 
world; a condition which is gradually reaching the 
point of seeming to have no solution. 



XIII 



Social life can be bettered only by individual 
self -denial. 

(Daily Reading, January 19th.) 

Do what you have to do in life according to 
divine will, and in that way you will improve the 
lives of everybody. 

(Daily Reading, January 17th.) 

"The crushing heaviness of evil is weighing down 
on men," I wrote fifteen years ago. "They are 
seeking the way to free themselves. They know that 
by uniting their efforts they would be able to lift 
up this weight and throw it off; but they cannot 
agree as to how they shall work, when every one is 
dropping lower and lower, leaving the weight on 
the shoulders of the rest. Thus it is getting heavier 
and heavier for the greater number, and this weight 
would have crushed them long ago if men had not 
been found who thought less of the consequences 
of their acts than of the concord of their conduct 
with the calls of their consciences. 

"These men are Christians. They are that because 
instead of seeking to attain the external goal, for 

82 



The Law of Violence 83 

which one must get the consent o all, they see only 
the internal goal, for the realization of which it is 
not necessary to agree with any one; and yet here 
is the foundation of true Christianity. 

"That is why freedom from the servitude in 
which we find ourselves at present is impossible for 
those who seek it in collective effort. It can only be 
obtained by the substitution of the law of love for 
the law of violence, that fundamental principle of 
Christianity. 

"This doctrine says to each individual: You 
cannot know the end of social life; you can only 
picture it as a form of progressive approach towards 
universal happiness, towards the realization of the 
Kingdom of God on earth. On the other hand, you 
are aware of the aim of personal life: it is the devel 
opment in each of the greatest amount of love, in 
order that the kingdom of God may be realized. 
This aim is certain and is easy to approach. 

"You can be ignorant of the best methods for 
attaining the external goal; you can meet obstacles 
in the way of its realization; while nothing can 
stop your drawing nearer to inner perfection: the 
increase of love in you and in others. 

"So it is enough to institute, in the place of the 
illusory social aim, this individual aim of life, the 
only sure and accessible one, and the chains that 
you thought were fastening you forever will drop 



84 The Law of Love 

immediately, and you will feel yourself absolutely 
free . . . 

"The Christian can ignore the laws established 
by the State because he has no need of them for 
himself, or for others; he considers that human 
life is better assured by the law of love professed by 
him than by the law of violence that one wants 
to impose on him. . . . 

"Having recognized the efficacy of the law of 
love, he does not consider the law of violence 
obligatory, and he denounces the other as the most 
horrible of mistakes. . . . 

"The profession of true Christianity which in 
cludes the precept of nonresistance to violence by 
evil, relieves those faithful to this doctrine from 
any external authority. Much better, it gives them 
the possibility of obtaining better conditions in life, 
those that men seek vainly by changing its external 
forms; in reality, these forms change only after 
the modifications that have arisen in mens* con 
sciences, and in the measure in which this conscience 
has evolved. 

"It was not the orders of a government that 
abolished the murder of children, tortures, slavery, 
but the universal conscience that caused these 
orders. 

"Since the evolution of conscience determines 
the changes in the modes of life, the contrary, as 



The Law of Violence 



well, should happen, they say; and as it is more 
agreeable and easier to modify external forms 
(because the results are more apparent) , this activ 
ity is preferred to the one whose aim is to modify 
conscience. That is why one is more frequently 
occupied with the foundation, rather than with the 
form. 

"It is often argued in proof of the falsity and 
lack of realization of the Christian doctrine the 
fact that, although revealed to men nineteen cen 
turies ago, it has been adopted by them only out 
wardly. It is said: even if it has been known for so 
long a time, it has not become our rule of conduct; 
if so many Christian martyrs have died without 
making any change in the order of existing things, 
that clearly shows that the doctrines are false and 
unattainable. 

"To think and speak thus is to say that seeds 
buried in the earth and not sprouting instantly are 
not good seeds and should be destroyed. 

"It is inevitable that the Christian doctrine was 
not admitted in its entire signification at the mo 
ment of its construction. 

"A doctrine ruining the whole order of existing 
things cannot be accepted entirely; that is why it 
was admitted only under a weakened form. The 
great majority of men were incapable at that epoch 
of assimilating this doctrine by spiritual means. 



The Law of Love 



They had to show them first by experience that all 
digressions from the commandments of the doc 
trine would be disastrous to them. 

"The doctrine was therefore accepted as a new 
outer cult, replacing paganism, but the pagan con 
ditions of life did not undergo any change what 
ever. Nevertheless, weakened as it was, this doctrine 
based on the Scripture could not help but produce 
a certain result, that in spite of all the efforts of 
the servants of false Christianity to hide its true 
meaning, penetrated little by little into the con 
sciences of men. 

"This double effort, positive and negative, lasted 
eighteen centuries. On the one hand people were 
drawn further and further away from the pos 
sibility of leading reasonable and good lives; on the 
other hand the doctrine was coming to light more 
and more under its true aspect. 

"In our own time we already see the true Chris 
tianity, until now understood only by a few minds 
endowed with religious sentiments, manifested in 
the form of socialist doctrines, accessible to the 
simplest being, while social life continues to exist 
in evident contradiction to this truth. 

"One trembles before the present horrible condi 
tion of human life: taxes, clergy, great landed 
properties, prisons, guillotines, cannon, dynamite, 
millionaires and beggars. In reality all these horrors 



The Law of Violence 87 

are the result of our own acts. Not only can they 
disappear, but they must disappear, in conformity 
with the new conscience of humanity. Christ said 
that He conquered the world; and as a matter of 
fact, He has conquered it. As dreadful as it is the 
evil no longer exists, because it has disappeared 
from the consciences of men. 

"To-day humanity is passing through a transi 
tion phase. Everything is ready for passing from 
one state to the other; it needs only a slight push to 
start this passing. And it can take place at any 
minute. * 

"The social conscience already condemns the 
former modes of life and is ready to adopt the new. 
The whole world feels it, and is convinced of it. 
But inertia, fear of the unknown, retards its appli 
cation in practice, as for a long time it has been 
retarded in theory. In such cases it sometimes needs 
only one word to make the force called public 
opinion change the whole order of things at once, 
and do it without a struggle, or violence. 

"The freeing of men from servitude, from 
ignorance, can not be obtained by revolution, syn 
dicates, peace congresses, etc., but simply by the 
conscience of each one of us, forbidding us to 
participate in violence and asking us in amaze 
ment: Why are you doing that? 

"It is enough for us to get free of the condition 



88 The Law of Love 

that hides our true mission from us, for us to ask 
in fear and indignation how any one can insist upon 
our committing such horrible crimes. And this 
awakening can take place at any instant." 

This is what I wrote fifteen years ago, and I 
repeat with conviction to-day that this awakening 
is about to take place. 

Certainly I shall not be there to aid in it. I, an 
old man, more than eighty years of age; but I know 
with the same certainty that I see spring follow 
winter and night come after day, that the time has 
already come in the life of Christian humanity. 



XIV 



The human soul is Christian in its nature. 
Christianity is always accepted by man as a rem 
iniscence of something forgotten. It raises him 
to a height from which he discovers a world of 
happiness, ruled by a natural law. Man's feelings 
on discovering the natural truth are those of a 
prisoner, one who has been confined in a dark 
tower and who, climbing to its highest balcony, 
discovers a marvellous world, until then un 
suspected by him. 



The idea of having to submit to man's law Is 
enslaving; the idea of submitting to God's law 
sets one free. 

(Daily Reading, January 28th.) 

One of the surest conditions of human action is 
the fact that the further away is the goal towards 
which we are struggling, and the less we desire to 
help the fruit of our efforts, the more certain we 
are of our success. 

(John RuskLn.) 

The most important and the most necessary 
work, as much for the authors as for others, is the 

89 



90 The Law of Love 

one that is fully appreciated a long time after the 
death of the author. 

(Daily Reading, May 28th.) 

"In order that men may be able to get rid of 
governments founded on violence, they must all be 
religious; in other words, they must all be prepared 
to sacrifice their material good to God's law, and 
live, not for the future, but for the present, in 
forcing themselves to accomplish the divine will 
which is in love. But the men of our time are not 
religious, and cannot, consequently, adopt this line 
of conduct." 

Those who say this suppose that to be religious is 
a state contrary to our nature; that it is manifested 
only in exceptional cases, and is the effect of educa 
tion or suggestion* In reality, it is the absence of 
faith, the only natural condition of life, that causes 
men to-day to believe that religion is not a natural 
need. 

Just as work is not an artificial thing imposed 
on men, but something inevitable, without which 
men cannot live, so faith, the consciousness of 
man's relation to the universe and its resulting rule 
of conduct, is an inevitable phenomenon. This 
faith, far from being artificial, exceptional, incul 
cated by education, is in human nature; we cannot 
do without it any more than birds who have lost 
their wings can fly. 



The Law of Violence 9J. 

If in the Christian world to-day we see men who 
have lost their consciences, or rather, whose reli 
gious feeling has been obscured, this abnormal situa 
tion is temporary, has happened by chance, bred 
of special conditions in which men are living; this 
state is as exceptional as that of men who live 
without working. 

So in order to reconquer this sentiment which is 
natural and indispensable to life, it is necessary for 
men to dissipate the lies that obscure the sentiment 
within them. 

It will be sufficient to free them from the de 
ception of the Christian doctrine as corrupted by 
the Church, which justifies a social organization 
founded on violence, for the chief obstacle to the 
supreme law of love to disappear at once; the law 
that tolerates no exception, and that was revealed 
to humanity nineteen centuries ago, as the only 
answer to the demands of modern conscience. 

From the moment that this law penetrates the 
universal conscience as the supreme law of life, 
our dreadful moral condition, permitting the great 
est iniquities and acts of barbarism to be considered 
natural, will disappear of itself. Then will come to 
pass everything dreamed of and promised to-day 
by socialist and anarchist builders of future worlds. 
The result obtained will be even greater. 

And this end will be attained just because it will 



92 The Law of Love 

not be necessary to make use of the violent means 
that the transgressors extoll to-day. We will be 
free from the evil that is torturing and corrupting 
the whole world, not by preserving the present 
governments, monarchies or republics, or by sup 
pressing them and replacing them with socialist 
or communists organizations; or in general, by 
conceiving an organization and imposing it by 
force; but by having recourse to the only way: 
each one of us, without worrying about the result 
to ourselves or others, must in our own lives ob 
serve the supreme law of love condemning every 
violence. 



XV 



A man who continues to live in error sees the 
incarnation of power in certain sacred institutions 
which are the indispensable organs of the social 
body. The man who awakens to the truth sees this 
assumed by men sunk in error and who attribute 
to it a fantastic importance having no possible 
justification, and who accomplish their will by 
force. 

For the clairvoyant, these lost people, bribed as 
often as not, resemble brigands who hold up 
travellers on the high roads. For any one who has 
awakened to the truth, the entity called State does 
not exist, and therefore there is not the slightest 
justification, for him, for the acts of violence 
committed in the name of the State. And any 
participation in these acts is impossible for him. 

To sum up, state violence will disappear, not 
with the aid of external means, but thanks only 
to the calls of conscience of men who have 
awakened to the truth. 

(Daily Reading, October 16th.) 

The objection will be made: "But how can we 
get along without a government, or any public 
authority? No state of society has ever existed 

93 



94 The Law of Love 

without a government, or any public authority? 
No state of society has ever existed without one or 
the other." 

Men are so accustomed to the government under 
which they live that it seems to them an inevitable, 
permanent form of social life. 

To tell the truth, it is so only in appearance; 
men have lived and are still living outside of any 
static organization. All the savage peoples who have 
not yet attained to what we call civilization have 
lived and are still living in that way. Men whose 
conception of life go beyond civilization live thus 
also; as they are living in Europe, in America, and 
above all in Russia, where Christian communities 
deny public authority, not feeling the need of it, 
and submitting only to forced interference. 

The State is only a temporary form of human 
groups. Just as the life of an individual is constantly 
in a state of evolution and bettering itself, so the 
life of an entire community progresses and im 
proves. 

Every human being begins as a nurseling, 
plays and studies; then he begins to work, marries, 
brings up his children, gets rid a little of all his 
passions, and acquires wisdom with age. The life 
of nations evolves in the same way; only their 
phases of development last not years, but hundreds 
and thousands of years. And as the necessary trans- 



The Law of Violence 9$ 

formations take place in the spiritual, or rather, 
intangible world, in the case of the individual, the 
essential changes in humanity take place at first in 
the intangible world also: that of the religious 
conscience. And as with the individual the trans 
formations are so slow that one could not indicate 
the month, the day or the hour when the child 
becomes a youth, and the youth an adult, and we 
cannot always say positively when these changes 
have already taken place; neither can we indicate 
the epoch when humanity, or a certain part of 
humanity, passed from one religious age into 
another. But as we perceive that a youth is no 
longer a child, we see that humanity, or a certain 
part of it, has passed from one period into another, 
when the change has already taken place. 

To-day we are watching the passage of human 
ity from one age to another among the nations of 
the Christian world. 

We do not know the hour when a child becomes 
a youth, but we know that he can no longer play 
childish games; we cannot indicate the year, nor 
even the decade, when the Christian world passed 
from its former form of life and commenced the 
other age, determined by the religious conscience; 
but we cannot help seeing that the Christian world 
can no longer play seriously at conquests, at dip 
lomatic artifices, at constitutions, at democratic, 



96 The Law of Lave 

socialist, revolutionary and anarchist parties, and 
above all can no longer give itself up to all sorts of 
games that are based on violence* 

This phenomenon is becoming evident among us 
particularly in Russia, after the external transfor 
mation of our political government. Seriously 
minded people cannot help feeling, as regards this 
new form of government, as an adult would feel 
if he were given a present of a toy that he had 
never seen as a child. No matter how interesting 
and new the toy is, the adult has no need of it, and 
can only receive it with a smile, That is the attitude 
in Russia of all thinking men, as well as of the 
popular masses, in regard to the Constitution, the 
Douma, and all sorts of parties, revolutionary and 
otherwise. 

The Russians who I am convinced realize the 
true sense of Christ's doctrine can no longer seri 
ously believe that man's mission here below is to 
employ the short period between his birth and 
death in making speeches to legislative assemblies, 
in judging his brothers in the courts, in capturing 
them, in locking them up and assassinating them, 
or throwing bombs at them, in taking away their 
property; or to bother as to whether Finland, India, 
Poland, Korea, are annexed to what is called Russia, 
England, Prussia or Japan; or to seek to liberate 
these annexed countries by force and to be prepared 



The Law of Violence 97 

to kill each other in quantities for that purpose. It 
is impossible for a man of our time to be ignorant 
in his inner consciousness of the madness of such 
acts. 

For if we do not perceive the horror of the 
existence which we lead, if contrary to our nature, 
it is only because the atrocities in the midst of which 
we continue to live peacefully, appear so slowly 
that we do not perceive them. 

I once saw an old man abandoned to a horrible 
fate: worms were crawling all over his body; he 
could not move an inch without suffering atro 
ciously; nevertheless the progress of the disease was 
so slow that he did not perceive the horror of his 
condition; he only asked for tea and sugar. 

The same phenomenon is taking place in our 
social life: we no longer see its horror, because we 
have come to our present condition by degrees, and, 
even as the old man, we rejoice at the appearance 
of cinemas and automobiles. 

It is not enough to say that the suppression of 
violence, violence so contrary to the reasoning and 
loving nature of man, cannot make our present 
condition worse. That is why the question as to 
whether we can live without governments not only 
is not necessary, as the defenders of the order of 
existing things would have us believe, but it is 
quite ridiculous; as it would be to ask a man suf~ 



98 The Law of Love 

faring torture, how he could live if his martyrdom 
stopped, 

The privileged members of the present state 
imagine that the absence of every static organiza 
tion would cause complete anarchy, the struggle of 
all against all, as if it concerned a life in common, 
not only of animals (they live in peace without 
static violence) but of certain monstrous creatures, 
guided in their acts only by hate and madness. To 
tell the truth, they picture men like this because 
they attribute to them aptitudes contrary to their 
natures, and which, in reality, are developed by the 
state of government that they uphold, in spite of 
the evil that it does to men. 

That is why the question as to what would men's 
lives be without authority, government, without 
public authority, can only be answered thus: it 
is certain that in any case the evils caused by the 
government will disappear: no more exclusive pos 
session of the earth, no more taxes employed for 
harmful purposes, no more divisions between 
nations, or subjection of .some by the rest, no more 
dissipation of all human forces to make war, no 
more fear of bombs on one side, or of gallows on 
the other; no more mad luxury for part of the 
people and horrible poverty for the rest. 



XVI 



"We are living in a period of discipline, of cul 
ture and of civilization, but it is still far off from 
being a moral period. One can say that, in the 
present condition of humanity, the prosperity in 
creases with the misery of its inhabitants. And 
one might ask if we would not be happier living 
in a primitive state, deprived of all our culture of 
the present day. For how can one make men happy 
without making them moral and good? 

(Kant, Daily Reading, June 16th.) 

Try to conduct yourself in such a way that 
you need not resort to violence. 

(Daily Reading, October 13th.) 

We are quite accustomed to find ways of man 
aging other people's lives; and these methods do 
not seem odd to us. They would be unnecessary, 
however, if men were religious and free. They are, 
in fact, the result of despotism, of the domination 
of one or a few over many. 

This error is harmful not only because it 
causes suffering to those who feel the oppression 
of despots, but even more so because their con 
sciences no longer warn them of the necessity of 

99 



100 The Law of Love 

bettering their condition. But only this conscience 
can Lave an effect on one's fellow being. 



Not only has one man not the right to dispose 
of a great number, but a great number have not 
the right to dispose of a single man. 

(V. Tchertkov. Daily Reading, 
November 22nd.) 

"Wonderful. But will you kindly tell us what 
form human society will take when it decides to 
live without government?" ask those who believe 
that men can always know what the social life of 
the future will be, and who therefore credit the 
same knowledge to those who wish to live without a 
government. 

This idea is only a common superstition, very 
old and very prevalent, it is true. Men, whether 
they submit, or refuse to submit to government, 
never know and cannot know what form this 
future state will take. How much less, then, could 
a minority organize the lives of everybody, for this 
organization can be effected not according to the 
will of some of them, but as the result of numerous 
intervening factors, the principal among which is 
the religious development of the majority of men. 

The superstition that causes one to think that 
he can tell in advance how society will be organized 



The Law of Violence 101 

in the future, has its origin in the desire of the trans 
gressors to justify their conduct, and in the desire 
of the victims to explain and lighten the weight 
of the constraint. The former persuade them 
selves and others that they know the way to 
make life take the form that they consider the best. 
The latter, who undergo such constraint that they 
do not feel strong enough to free themselves, have 
the same conviction; for it permits them to give 
a certain excuse for their position. 

The history of nations ought to destroy this 
superstition entirely. 

At the end of the eighteenth century a few 
Frenchmen tried to maintain the old despotic re 
gime; but in spite of all their efforts this regime fell, 
and the republic replaced it. In the same way, in 
spite of all the efforts of the republican chiefs, in 
spite of all their acts of violence, the empire re 
placed the republic, and thus they succeeded each 
other: empire, coalition, Charles X, a new revolu 
tion, a new republic, Louis-Philippe, then other 
governments up to the present day republic. 

The same facts have been repeated wherever 
violence is the basis of action. As for example, all 
the efforts of the papacy, far from killing protes 
tantism, have only developed it. The progress of 
socialism is due to the efforts of capitalists. 

In short, even in the case where the government 



102 The Law of Love 

established by the aid of violence is maintained for 
a certain length of time, or is modified by the use 
of force, it is only because at that period the form 
of the social organization continues or ceases to 
answer to the moral condition of the people. Not 
because any external cause assures or modifies its 
existence. 

It follows that the axiom whereby a minority 
can organize the life of the majority, an axiom in 
the name of which one commits the greatest crimes, 
is only a superstition. In the same way the activity 
that results from it, and which is generally con 
sidered as most honorable and important, as much 
by the directors of the state as by the revolution 
aries, is in reality only a pastime as useless as it is 
harmful, and which above all prevents the true 
happiness of humanity. 

This superstition has caused and still causes much 
blood to flow, and much horrible suffering. The 
worst of it is that this superstition has always pre 
vented and still prevents social betterment that 
answers to the degree of the development of the 
human conscience. It prevents true progress, be 
cause men spend their entire efforts in concerning 
themselves with others, thereby neglecting their 
own moral regeneration, which alone can con 
tribute to the regeneration of the world in general. 

In fact, social life advances, and advances neces- 



The Law of Violence 103 

sarily towards the eternal ideal of perfection, thanks 
to the progress of individuals in the endless path 
of perfection. 

One sees from all this the horror of the supersti 
tion that makes us neglect our task of individual 
betterment, and which alone procures personal 
happiness and general welfare; the only means of 
which we are really masters, contrary to the super 
stition that invites us to concern ourselves with the 
happiness of others which is not in our power. It 
makes us employ the means of constraint as harm 
ful for us as for others, and which takes us further 
from individual as well as social perfection. 



XVII 



Let us each concern ourselves only with the 
solution of the inner question, that of our own 
conduct in life, and all questions concerning the 
outer world will thereby receive their best solution. 

We do not know, we cannot know, in what 
general well-being consists; but we surely know 
that the realization of this well-being is possible 
only when we fulfill the law of goodness revealed 
to each man. 

If, instead of dreaming of universal salvation 
we concern ourselves with our own; if, instead of 
liberating humanity we liberate ourselves, we 
would do a great deal more for the salvation and 
freedom of every one. 

(Herzen. Daily Reading, June 30th.) 

In the individual life and in the social life there 
is only one law: if you wish to better your life, be 
ready to sacrifice it* 

(Daily Reading, January 19th.) 

Accomplish your task in life by obeying the 
divine will, and you will be certain to help towards 

104 



The Law of Violence 105 

the betterment of social life in the most efficient 
way. 

(Daily Reading, January 17th.) 

The following objection is often made: "All that 
you say may be true, but it will be possible to 
abstain from every act of violence only when the 
whole world, or even the majority, will understand 
the disastrous, futile, and senseless meaning of 
violence. While waiting for that, what can a few 
isolated individuals do? Must we not defend our 
selves, and let our neighbors be attacked by the 
wicked?" 

Let us suppose that a brigand is raising his knife 
over his victim; I see him and am armed with a 
revolver; so I can kill him. But I am not absolutely 
certain what the brigand will do. He might not 
strike, while I would surely kill him. That is why 
the only thing a man can do in such a case, is to 
follow his invariable rule of conduct, dictated by 
his conscience. But his conscience may demand his 
own life, but not that of another. 

Thus, to the question as to what one should do 
in the presence of a crime committed by one or by 
a great number, every man, free of the superstition 
that affirms the possibility of foreseeing the future, 
will answer: Do unto others as you would have 
them do unto you. 



106 The Law of Love 

"But others steal, pillage, kill, while I do none of 
these things. Let them also follow the law of mutual 
aid, then I, in my turn, can be asked to observe it," 
again object the men of our world, with the greater 
assurance the higher their situations in the social 
scale. 

tf l do not steal," say the sovereign, the minister, 
the general, the judge, the landed proprietor, the 
merchant, the soldier, the police agent. As a matter 
of fact, our idea of our social organization, founded 
on violence, is so impressed upon us that we do not 
perceive all the crimes that they commit each day 
in the name of the public good; we see only the 
rare attempts of violence of those who are called 
murderers, burglars, or thieves. 

<l He is a murderer, he is a thief, he does not ob 
serve the rule of not doing unto others what you 
would not have them do unto you," say the same 
people who go on killing in war, forcing nations 
to prepare for carnage, and who steal from and 
despoil their own, as well as foreign nations. If the 
rule of mutual aid has no more effect upon those 
who, in our society are called murderers or thieves, 
it is only because they constitute a part of the 
immense majority of people who for generations 
and generations were robbed and despoiled by men, 
who do not see the criminal character of their acts. 

That is why to the question of knowing what 



The Law of Violence 107 

attitude to take as regards those who use force 
against us, one can only answer: "Stop doing unto 
others what you would not have them do unto 
you." 

Without speaking of the inconsistency and of 
the injustice of the punishment in certain cases of 
violence, when the most horrible crimes committed 
by the state in the name of the general good are 
left unpunished, these same punishments have a 
different result from what is generally expected. 
In fact, they destroy the powerful force of public 
opinion, which is a hundred times more capable of 
guaranteeing society against every act of violence 
than are the prisons and guillotines. 

This reasoning can be applied with striking proof 
in international relations. 

"How could we do otherwise than resist the 
invasion of our country by savages who come to 
take away our property, our wives, our daughters?" 
object those who wish to protect themselves from 
the crimes that they commit against other nations. 
"Yellow peril," cry the whites; "White peril," cry 
the Hindus, Chinese and Japanese with more 
reason. 

But as soon as one is freed from the superstitions 
that justify violence, one understands all the 
horror of the crimes committed by one nation 
against another, and even more, the moral stupidity 



108 The Law of Love 

that allows English, Russians, Germans, French, 
Americans to dream of protecting themselves 
against the very acts of violence that they commit 
in India, in Indo-China, in Poland, in Manchuria, 
in Algeria. 

It is enough, then, to free ourselves, even for a 
time, from the horrible superstition that lets us 
believe in the possibility of knowing the future 
forms of society a prophecy that justifies every 
act of violence, and sincerely approves of our pres 
ent life in order to understand immediately that 
recognizing the necessity of opposing evil by 
violence is only the justification of our habitual 
vices: vengeance, cupidity, envy, ambition, pride, 
cowardice, and spite. 



XVIII 



The Creator Himself has so arranged matters 
that human actions are guided by interest and not 
by justice; which is why all our efforts to estab 
lish the value of certain actions are in vain. Not 
one of us has ever known, does not know and can 
never know, what the result of these actions, or 
series of actions, will be for ourselves or for others. 
But we all can know which action is just, and 
which is not. We can know also that the con 
sequences of justice will, eventually, be as good 
as possible, for others, as for ourselves, although 
we can never say of what this good will consist. 

(John Ruskin.) 

And ye shall know the truth, and the truth 
shall make you free. 

(John, viii, 32.) 

Man thinks; he was created thus. And he should 
reason in a sensible way, that is evident. The man 
who reasons in this manner thinks first of his aim 
in life: thinks of his soul, of God, Just see of what 
worldly men are thinking. Of everything, except 
that. They dream of dancing music, singing, other 
pleasures; they are occupied in building, getting 

109 



110 The Law of Love 

rich, becoming powerful; they envy the rich, and 
the kings. But they never think of the mission of 
man. 

(Pascal. Daily Reading, June 20th.) 

From the moment that you are liberated, all of 
you, leaders and rich, oppressed and poor, who suf 
fer from the lies of false and static Christianity, 
lies that hide what Christ revealed to you and what 
your reason and your heart order you to do, you 
will understand that the cause of all your physical 
and moral sufferings has been in yourself. 

Understand then, all of you, that you were born 
neither slaves nor masters, that you are all free; but 
you are so only when you have observed the 
supreme law of life, and this law has been revealed 
to you. It will be sufficient for you to renounce the 
lies that hide it from you for you to see at once in 
what it consists and where your happiness lies. This 
law is in love, and happiness is found in its observ 
ance. Understand that, and you will become really 
free; you will acquire everything that to-day you 
are vainly seeking to obtain by the complicated 
means suggested to you by corrupted men. 

"Come unto me, all ye that labor and are heavy laden, 
and I will give you rest. Take my yoke upon you, and 
learn of me; for I am meek and lowly in heart: and ye 
shall find rest unto your souls. For my yoke is easy and 
my burden is light." 

(Matthew, xi, 28-32.) 



The Law of Violence ill 

You will be preserved from evil and you will 
acquire the real good, not by looking after your 
interest, not by envy, hatred, anger, ambition; not 
even by a sense of justice, or above all by the care 
of organizing the life of others; but, strange as it 
may seem, only by the work of your own soul, not 
following any outside interests, and not trying to 
reason with its dictates. 

Understand, then, that the belief in the pos 
sibility of ordering the life of others is a vulgar 
superstition which lasts only on account of its 
hoary age. Understand that the men who make 
use of it, beginning with the leaders of the state 
and the ministers, and finishing with the spies and 
executioners on the one hand, and the chiefs and 
members of the opposition parties on the other, are 
only pitiable people, strayed, occupied with a task 
not only vain and stupid, but even the most abomin 
able that one can conceive. 

Men already see the ignominy of the spy and 
executioner, and are beginning to see that of the 
police, detectives, and even to a certain degree, of 
military men; but they do not yet see it of the 
judge, the minister, the sovereign, chiefs of parties, 
revolutionaries. And yet the work of the latter is 
as vile, as contrary to human nature, even worse, 
than the work of the executioner or the spy, 
because it is more hypocritical. 



112 The Law of Love 

Understand then, all of you, especially the 
young, that to want to impose an imaginary state 
of government on others by violence is not only a 
vulgar superstition, but even a criminal work. Un 
derstand that this work, far from assuring the 
good of men, is only a lie, a more or less unconscious 
hypocricy, and is always hiding the lowest passions. 

Understand it, you, men of to-morrow, and stop 
looking for an illusionary happiness by participa 
ting in the administration of the state, by judicial 
institutions, by instruction, by all kinds of parties 
who have the good of the masses as an aim. Pay 
attention to only one thing, that which you need 
the most, that is the most accessible, which gives 
the most happiness to us and to every one: the 
increase of love in us by the suppression of vices 
and passions that keep it from manifesting itself. 
Understand that the observance of this supreme 
law of love is becoming as inevitable for us as is the 
law of flight for the birds, the law of nutrition 
by plants for the herbiverous, by meat for the 
carniverous; and that consequently, the least 
transgression of this law is disastrous to us. 

Remember it, consecrate your life to this joyous 
work; just begin it, and you will see that it is the 
true work in life, and it alone determines the 
amelioration of the condition of everybody an 
end that you follow blindly by false methods. Do 



The Law of Violence 113 

not forget that the common bond is in the union of 
men, and that this union can never be attained by 
means of violence. It is enough that every one 
should observe the law of life, and this union will 
be realized without the need of seeking for it. This 
supreme law, alone, is the same for all of us and 
unites us all. 

Revealed by Christ, it is recognized to-day by 
men, and its observance is obligatory as long as 
there is no other law, a still clearer one, conforming 
more to the calls of human conscience, revealed 
to us. 



XIX 



Some seek good or happiness in power, others 
in science, still others in pleasure. As to those who 
really understand what their happiness is, they 
know that it need not be possessed by the few, 
but by every one; they know that the true good is 
the lot of all men at the same time, without divi 
sion or jealousy; no one, unless he wishes, can lose 
it, 

(Pascal. Thoughts of the Wise, xxvii, 4.) 

We possess a single infallible guide and this is 
the Universal Spirit that lives in men as a whole, 
and in each one of us, which makes us aspire to 
what we should aspire; it is the spirit that com 
mands the tree to grow towards the sun, the 
flower to throw off its seed in autumn, us to 
reach out towards God, and by so doing become 
united to each other. 

(Daily Reading, November 16th.) 

The true faith attracts people to it, not by the 
promise of good to the believer, but by the indica 
tion of the only means of saving us from all evil, 
and from death itself. 

(Daily Reading, September llth.) 

114 



The Law of Violence 



Salvation lies not in the cult, nor in the practice 
of a religion, but in the clear comprehension of 
the meaning of our life. 

(Daily Reading, September llth,) 

That is all that I want to say. 

I want to say that we are in a situation and in 
a period in which we can no longer remain, and 
that, willingly or unwillingly, we are obliged to 
start out on a new path. And to follow it we do not 
have to invent a new religion, or any scientific 
theories explaining the meaning of life and serving 
as a guide to it; it would be futile, above all, to have 
recourse to any special activity; it will be sufficient 
to adopt this single rule: free ourselves from the 
superstitions of false and static Christianity. 

Let each one understand that he has not the right, 
or even the possibility, to organize the lives of 
others, but that he, in his own life, should act in 
conformity with the supreme religious law that has 
been revealed to him, and the order of things that 
reigns among the so-called Christian nations an 
order that makes the whole world suffer, which 
answers so little to the demands of our consciences 
and which makes humanity unhappier each day 
will immediately disappear. 

"Whoever you are: sovereign, judge, proprietor, 
worker, beggar, reflect and take pity on your soul 



116 The Law of Love 

No matter how obscured your brain may be by 
your authority, your wealth, no matter how badly 
treated you may be and how irritated by misery 
and humiliations, you possess and you manifest like 
all of us, the divine spirit, which asks you clearly 
to-day: Why do you martyrize yourself and make 
all those about you unhappy? Understand who 
you are, just how insignificant and infallible is that 
which you call "y u " your spiritual self and 
having understood it, commence to live entirely 
for the accomplishment of the superior mission of 
your life which has been revealed to you by uni 
versal wisdom, by the doctrine of Christ, and by 
your own conscience. 

Put the good of your life in the progressive free 
dom of your mind, freedom from all the illusions 
of the flesh, and in the improvement of your love 
for your fellow man which is, after all, the same 
thing. As soon as you will have begun to live thus, 
you will be aware of a joyous sensation full of 
liberty and happiness. You will be surprised to see 
that the same external conditions, with which you 
were so concerned, and which were far from real 
ization, will not prevent the coming of the greatest 
possible happiness. 

And if you are unhappy I know that you are 
reflect upon what has been proposed to you here, 
and which I have not imagined, but is the result of 



The Law of Violence 117 

the thoughts and feelings of the best minds and 
human hearts, and which is the only way to deliver 
you from your unhappiness, to acquire the greatest 
good that you can get in this life. 

That is what I have wanted to say to my brothers 
before dying. 



APPENDIX I 
TO CHAPTER III 



The men who, in the opinion of the directing 
classes, do the greatest harm to society, are hung, 
banished or locked up in prisons; thousands of 
other men, less dangerous, are driven away from the 
capitals and large cities and wander, hunger stricken 
and in rags, across Russia; police agents, in uniform 
or in civilian clothes, watch them, spy upon them 
and arrest them; books and newspapers, considered 
reprehensible, are seized. 

While this is taking place there are animated 
debates at the Duma as to the best way to assure the 
prosperity of a nation, or on the necessity of con 
structing a fleet, of using certain systems for or 
ganizing the property of the peasants, of levying 
or not levying certain taxes. In this Russian parlia 
ment everything takes place as it does among other 
civilized nations: leaders, lobbyists, quorum, 
parties, etc. It would seem as if there were nothing 
missing. However, it is precisely among us, in Rus 
sia, and at this moment, that the order of existing 

118 



Appendix I 119 



things is approaching nearer and nearer to the 
moment of its disappearance. 

In fact, let us admit that you, men of the gov 
ernment, still shoot five, ten, thirty thousand con 
demned people; besides which you are inclined to 
follow the example of the governments which 
repressed the former European revolutions. 

But there are other forces than these forces of 
repression; moral forces, the most powerful, much 
more powerful than the gallows, guns, prisons, 
spies. You are not ignorant of the fact that all those 
whom you have strangled or shot have fathers, 
brothers, wives, sisters, friends, co-religionists; 
and if, by executions, you get rid of those whom 
you send to their graves, you arouse not only their 
relations, but even among strangers you will make 
a much greater number of enemies, who will be 
much angrier than were those whom you have 
killed. The more pe % ople you cause to disappear, the 
less you will get rid of your principal enemy, uni 
versal hate. By means of your crimes you only set 
loose this hate, and render it more dangerous. 

The worst of it is that you arouse sentiments of 
cruelty which you believe you can counteract by 
executions. You know well that the latter are not 
accomplished only with the aid of your writings in 
the courts and in the ministries: they are done by 
men to other men. 



120 Appendix I 



A young soldier of the reserve, puzzled, told me 
how he was obliged to dig a long trench to bury 
ten men condemned to be shot; and how some 
soldiers were forced to kill the condemned, while 
others were posted behind the assassinating soldiers, 
ready to shoot them if they hesitated to carry out 
their brutal orders. 

Can an act like that take place without leaving 
any trace in the human soul, an act commanded by 
the very people whom the soldiers are taught to 
look upon as estimable and sacred? 

I read lately in a newspaper that a wretched 
governor general had given to be published an order 
of the day in which he complimented two "brave" 
policemen because they had shot an unarmed 
prisoner who was trying to escape; and as a recom 
pense the governor saw that each of the policemen 
was paid 25 roubles. Not being able to believe in 
such an act of authority, to confirm it I wrote to 
the newspaper that published the order of the day. 
I received the order itself, and the information that 
praise for these murderous acts is habitual,, and is 
given by the highest dignatories. 

Can these words and acts take place without 
leaving any trace of corruption or cruelty upon 
those who read these orders of the day, or who 
participate in these acts? They cannot help arousing 
distrust and disgust for those who order these acts, 



Appendix I 121 



so against one's conscience, and for those who re 
ward the people who execute them. So it is evident 
that if thousands of people are suppressed, tens and 
hundreds of thousands are depraved by their partic 
ipation in these barbarous acts. They lose the re 
mainder of their religious and moral scruples and 
are prepared by this to commit the same atrocities 
to the very men who now force them to violence. 

And what do you say of the news spread by the 
newspapers among millions of readers giving the 
number of those condemned to death and those 
executed, news repeated each day, like the necessary 
news about the changing of the weather? If the 
readers do not ask themselves how the acts of the 
authorities can be reconciled with the Scriptures, 
or even with the sixth commandment of Moses, 
these contradictions can only arouse disdain for 
this commandment, for religion in general and for 
the authorities, as acts contrary to both religious 
law and to conscience. 

Is it not clear that these crimes of the authorities, 
instead of causing their enemies to disappear, only 
increase their number? 

It ought to be evident to the directors themselves. 

If Marcus Aurelius, in spite of his gentleness and 
wisdom, could make war against and execute 
people without pangs of conscience, Christians can 
no longer do as much without recognizing their 



122 Appendix I 



criminality. The very fact of imagining peace con 
ferences, as hypocritical as they are stupid, and 
conditional condemnations, show that the leaders 
know perfectly well that what they are doing is 
wrong. They can try to persuade themselves and 
others that they are acting in virtue of superior 
considerations, but they cannot hide from them 
selves or from others all the degradation and all 
the horror of their activities. Everybody to-day 
knows that assassination is a crime, whatever the 
motive may be; kings, ministers, generals, know 
it just as well. 

And it is the same with revolutionaries of all 
parties, from the moment that they admit assas 
sination as a means to an end. They may say that 
they will no longer make use, as they are doing 
to-day, of means of violence when the reins of 
power are in their hands, but their acts are as im 
moral and as cruel as those of governments. That 
is why, like governments, they are the cause of the 
hatred, bestiality and corruption that are becoming 
more and more prevalent among us. 

The revolutionaries differ from the present mas 
ters because of the fact that the vanity of the 
latter's activity is evident, while the activity of the 
former, generally theoretical and rarely applied 
during revolutions, is less evident. That is why it 
seems less criminal. 



Appendix I 123 



In any case the methods of both are equally 
foreign to human nature, and to the principles of 
the Christian doctrine. In sowing to the same 
degree hatred and madness among men, they both 
not only do not attain the end that they follow, 
but take us further away from it. 

The two opposite camps governors and re 
volutionaries as much in Russia as in the rest of 
the world, can be compared to people, who, wish 
ing to warm themselves better, break up the walls 
of their house to make a furnace. 



APPENDIX II 
TO CHAPTER VII 



The Christian doctrine in its true sense, affirming 
love to be the supreme law, and not admitting 
violence in any case, answers so well to the human 
heart, gives such a certainty of liberty, and happi 
ness so independent of all desire, that it should have 
been accepted, one would think, from the moment 
it was known. 

In fact, men seek to realize it progressively, in 
spite of the efforts that the Church is making to 
hide its true sense. Unhappily, when the true sense 
of this doctrine began to appear, the greater part 
of the Christian world was already so accustomed 
to see the truth in the outer forms that it was no 
longer possible for it to perceive the exact sense of 
the doctrine, or its opposition to the existing state. 
That is why those who have more or less understood 
the Christian truth should free themselves, not 
only from the lying forms of false Christianity, 
but also from the belief in the necessity of a social 
state founded on the false religion of the Church. 

Thus it is that the men of our time, having 

124 



Appendix II 125 



rejected the dogmas, the miracles, and the sanctity 
of the Bible, and other articles of faith, are inca 
pable of freeing themselves from the false static 
doctrine that, thanks to false Christianity, hides 
the true doctrine* 

On the one hand, the great mass of workers con 
tinue to practice the cult by tradition, to believe in 
the Church to a certain degree and to believe as 
well in a static government founded on the official 
religion, so contrary to real Christianity. 

On the other hand, the so-called educated classes 
have for the most part abandoned this official 
religion a long time ago, and consequently do not 
believe in Christianity, but continue to believe, as 
unconsciously as the people, in the static organiza 
tion, which has violence as its principle, and which 
was established by the same Church Christianity 
in which they no longer believe. 

So neither the one nor the other can imagine any 
other social organization than the one founded on 
violence. 

It is really this unconscious faith, this supersti 
tion of the Christian world, according to which 
violence is the indispensable principle of every social 
organization, which constitutes the principle ob 
stacle to the Christian doctrine in its real sense. 



APPENDIX III 
TO CHAPTER VIII 

It is sufficient to speak of the principal law of 
the Christian doctrine, nonresistance to evil by 
violence, for men of the privileged classes, believers 
or unbelievers, to smile ironically, as if it were a 
question of an absurdity so evident that one cannot 
even speak seriously about it. 

The greater part of these people consider them 
selves moral and educated; they discuss seriously 
the question of the Trinity, of the Divinity of 
Christ, of the Redemption of the Sacraments, etc., 
or else they converse with you just as seriously as to 
which of the two principal political parties has the 
greatest chance of success, which grouping of the 
state is the most to be desired, what are the most 
likely visions of the future state: that of the social 
democrats, or of the social revolutionists; but all 
are equally convinced that one cannot speak seri 
ously of nonresistance to evil. 

Why? 

Simply because it is impossible for men not to 
feel that the admission of nonresistance to evil 

126 



Appendix III 127 



ruins their lives as they now are, and exacts of them 
something new, unknown, which terrifies them. 

That is why the questions about the Trinity, the 
Immaculate Conception, the Communion, etc. are 
capable of occupying serious people, while un 
believers can find amusement by discussing ques 
tions of syndicates, parties, socialism, communism, 
while nonresistance to evil seems an insane idea; 
and the more senseless it seems to them the higher 
their position. 

In the same way the force of the denial of the 
doctrine of nonresistance is in proportion to the 
degree of the power, wealth and civilization of men. 

Those who occupy powerful positions, the very 
rich, and those who, like the learned, justify the 
position of these people, simply shrug their shoul 
ders at every allusion to the law of nonresistance. 
Men less important, or less rich, or less clever, 
despise it equally. But all those whose lives are 
founded on violence judge with more or less disgust 
the possibility of the application of the law of non- 
resistance. 

So it is certain that if the admission of the 
Christian doctrine in its real sense depended upon 
people who enjoy privileged positions, the passing 
of the state founded on violence to the one having 
love for its principle would be nearer than it is 
to-day, above all in Russia, where more than two 



128 Appendix III 



thirds of the population are not yet depraved by 
wealth, power, or by civilization. 

As the majority of the Russian people have no 
motive and no advantage in depriving themselves 
of lives where love reigns, it must surely be they 
who will take initiative in replacing the present 
state by a new one that one's conscience, already 
clear on the subject, indicates. 



APPENDIX IV 
TO CHAPTER XVII 

Finding strange the blindness of the men who 
believe in the necessity for violence, and convinced 
as I am of the contrary, it is not arguments, how 
ever, that can persuade me and convince others of 
the truth; what determines my belief is the cer 
tainty of the spiritual nature of man, of which love 
is the manifestation. But real love, revealed to us by 
Christ, excludes the possibility of all violence. 

I do know, and no one can know, if the use 
of violence or resignation when threatened with 
evil is useful or useless, harmful or harmless; what 
I know, and what every one knows, is that love is 
good; it is good when men feel affection for me; it 
is much better if I feel affection for men; in fact, 
the greatest good of all is my affection for all, not 
only for those who love me, but, as Christ said, 
for those who hate me, who injure me. 

Strange as it may be to any one who has not felt 
this, it is nevertheless true; and the more I ponder 
on it, the more surprised I am not to have felt it 
sooner. 

129 



130 Appendix IV 



The real love, which denies self and identifies its 
"ego" with another is synonymous with the awak 
ening in the soul of the superior, universal principle 
of life. This love is the true, and gives all the good 
that it can give when it is only love that is to 
say, free of any personal interest. And it is this 
kind of love that must be felt for the enemy or the 
offender. 

That is why the recommendation to love not 
those who love you, but those who hate you is no 
exaggeration; it simply indicates the impossibility 
of any exception, and the possibility of gaining the 
highest good that love can give. 

The fact that it should be so is self-evident; but 
one must feel it to be convinced. As soon as one has 
felt it, offenses and attacks become desirable. 

It follows that the human squl suffers when one 
opposes evil to evil, and on the other hand, feels 
the greatest happiness in returning good for evil. 




1 08 279 



